At least wait a bit before [reposting](http://www.reddit.com/r/woahdude/comments/jyxly/mighty_morphing_power_art_gif/).
Downvotes for [this](http://i.imgur.com/MzJik.png).
conservative/republican types accuse wikipedia of not being source.  they do this because it consistently proves them wrong any time they try to promote a lie.  does it have misinformation?  yes, but only temporarily (and without accurate citations.)
I'd need 3G.... Not everyone has access to it?
Thats Obama's home state! Now things start to make sense.
Haha I remember having to upgrade computers in order to play MechWarrior 2.
It's different for everyone - but finding your own way to deal will strengthen you . For me, I surrounded myself with friends and pretty much never gave myself an opportunity to sit there and think about her
Kyle Scherrer. Google him. I met him at a rock workshop.
[pronounced z-surf](http://i.imgur.com/clNNk.png)  I only chose this name because it was easy to remember. (Look at your keyboard, assuming you use qwerty, which I no longer do).
By NYC, do you mean New York City? Because that's not an American phone number.
Some column on the SLC.
DEM COMMENTS  &gt; Interesting thing about this post is the fact that you only have to change one word and you get to include a whole other group that gets marginalized. Skinny.  &gt;  ---------------  &gt; This post is about fatphobia, not skinny people’s body issues. Please stay on topic. Thank you. :)
What I was getting at is that it's very unclear as to *what* exactly is $210.
And this is why I'm against breast implants. There is NOTHING wrong with this picture.
Color blindness is also a DQ for the nuke program.
Yes, they keep referring to Sarah Jessica Parker as a woman and not a horse.
Use the ideal gas law.  pv=nRT  p is constant, n is constant   v2 = 2*v1  R = v1/T1 R = v2/T2  Since the R is a constant  v1/T1 = v2/T2 and you know that v2 = 2*v1  Solve for T2.  The second number seems about right. The energy generated is 9.8joules. The specific heat of water is 4.18kJ/kg water. Looking at this, you'll have about a .002degree raise in temp (or so, top of the head calc here).
Is it just me or does he look like the KFC guy http://scm-l3.technorati.com/10/09/04/17673/kfc1.jpg ?
A while back they changed it so that all questions are public by default.  Before this, they were private unless you specifically made them public.  My guess is they're an older account and answered a lot of their questions some time ago.
In your title you asked a question in which you references three math classes, yet you didn't actually mention what they were. :( Also, it might be helpful to mention what your previous math background is so we know what you would be suited for.  Btw, instead of using the phone, you could just skype with people.
CTRL+SHIFT+N  You're welcome
I mean, now you're off technique and talking about execution. That's an entirely separate critique from "Talk or shut up about it," and definitely a more valid one, if only because it makes only subjective claims. 
with a MFLB, shake after *every* hit!
Whatever troll boy. You are far too inept to be interesting.
&gt; compared to our own Sun which was created 4.6 billion years ago  Gotta love Fox.
A 0.3 MP camera can take a good shot. It's the photographer at fault.
Can I get in on this? haven't been laid in awhile.
Just to clarify, this is about the United States?
I read A Game of Thrones, yes. 
the tongue scraper thing scares me, but I'll have to face it now. How far back should I scrape? Listerine doesn't help. It just makes my mouth smells like minty ass.
Is Goverment different than Government? 
I think there's a special place in hell for people that do this to their pets.
A very puissant point regarding the Tower of Joy and defeat of the KingsGuard, though.  7 to 3 odds withstanding, it seems likely he matched swords and won against at least one of those guys.  And he lived, along with the never seen since Howland Reed.  At this point, for all we know, Howland could be super ninja/Braveheart/Dread Pirate Roberts super warrior, and shouldered most of the burden of that fight to keep Ned alive.  And Succeeding!  I hope he turns out to be a complete bad ass so I can say after that "Tourney"  result: SUCK IT SELMY....  I also might add that my wife is giving me odd looks as I sit here laughing as I write this.
You don't need to impress or lie, that's right, which is why a playful dismissal will usually win her comfort and get her laughing. I can't think of a single situation where this *hasn't* worked, to be honest.
&gt;give a digital photograph of three sides of my torso  What?
Gothic 4 I don't know, but Risen is pretty good.
You're damn right I doob. ;)
I don't want to double post so here's my [other post in this thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/sports/comments/k09az/texas_am_to_leave_big_12_official_press_release/c2glrh9) about other schools problems with the LHN. I would also like to also correct you in that A&amp;M was[ never given the opportunity](http://www.washingtonpost.com/sports/colleges/texas-aandm-ad-byrne-sounds-off-about-longhorn-network-in-blog-post/2011/08/31/gIQAUUgosJ_story.html) to make a network with Texas. 
Shit.
I'm not sure what you're getting at, or if you're just trolling me, but there is really no way to have green power production without storing energy. Furthermore, there definitely are means to do this safely using chemicals. For instance, you could store it as fatty oils, which are highly stable yet still store a large amount of energy.
http://i.imgur.com/kRfMq.jpg  I tried
Then I change my question to: What's your favorite Japanese food?
and then, after getting over her, and meeting a great girl, your new girlfriend left you for the same guy ? Must be horrible :/
What's the GOP's justification for raising the payroll tax on poor/middle-class Americans, but keeping the payroll tax cap?  Is it just derping about "job creators"?
One of these days I won't be working during the Thursday meet up and join in. Have fun. 
Pizarro was able to do it. I would say the diseases you brought back would  do most of the killing.  Additionally, I would say that the Romans would just give you what you wanted, and try to learn as much as they could from you which being Marines wouldn't be much.
thanks man im going to post my first commic
I hate this bullshit. I see it on Bleacher Report all the time. Why, and how do you you predict any game outcome, let alone a SUPERBOWL, 2 weeks out from regular season? It just blows me away how people can do this. 
What he said. My life is a friends episode. Except, you, know, without all the cash.
I cannot downvote this enough due to scientific inaccuracy. 
I have yet to see a Pinkie Pie on r/minecraft.
Paul Dini, Alan Burnett, and *Neal Stephenson* consulting? Good *Christ* that sounds like an amazing script.
Deus Ex Digital Edition is $35 on Amazon and it activates on Steam. It also comes with the pre order DLC.
CRY!!!!
Hope all goes well for you buddy! Glad to hear he's coming home with you today.
lulz.  You'll be happy someday, you special snowflake, you.
I had a friend in freshman year who told me that those people are actually paid to stand there and they make quite a bit of money.  Considering how they work in regular shifts and seem to not act like the people downtown who actually are homeless and sleep in doorways, there might be some truth to that.
Np!
omg yes!
1. Get in the water  2. Stop drowning  I'm joking, but really the best way is to just start. The 0 to 1500 workout set is based on the premise that once you can swim a mile without stopping you've corrected most basic technique errors simply due to finding the most efficient way to swim. It's in the sidebar and if your goal is to get a workout I'd recommend starting with that. Once you've reached that level of proficiency you'll have a lot more options.
Story of my life! God I fucking hate pants. Anything besides sweatpants or gym shorts make me feel uncomfortable and constrained. My outfits vacillate between cute dress and flip flops, and gym shorts and a t-shirt. Usually without a bra because I have small tittays.  I invested in some sweatpants that have piano keys printed on it, so when I am super lazy it looks like I am actually trying to be cute or some shit. People love those pants.
I think part of it is that the store bought kind is very well blended. Maybe mix it up in the blender?
Monster Hunter tri,   Whats that? Not enough moedrama to be a JRPG? **FUCK YOU, MH3 FTW &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; **
I do know a lot of things you don't, and I really can not go into detail about them. I've spent my whole adult life learning to get to the position I am currently in. I'm not trying to sound cloak and dagger, but I really have to be careful about what I say. I'm not a criminal, but I do work for a company that has a very strict policy on giving any information away.  No, I can't say which company, other than we are one of the largest Hydroponic suppliers and manufacturers in the world. I have a direct, personal, daily relationship with people who are the subject of this documentary, and who have been **directly** inconvenienced, or harmed by this documentary. I feel no obligation to prove to you that I'm not just "bullshitting" as you so eloquently put it. This is my career, I am a professional Horticulturalist in a specified field.  What I can tell you that I work out of the west coast of Canada, and the industry in Canada is different in a few ways than the American market. Slightly different laws, and different standards could explain some things, but "The Union" was produced in an area called the Okanagan Valley about 4 hours east of Vancouver, British Columbia. This area houses some of the most mind-bogglingly huge gardens on the planet. For decades, B.C. was responsible for the biggest chunk of production for North America. California has since become a massive supplier, and it has lowered the demand slightly in said area. Many of the growers, or insiders came from this area, and it is quite a well connected community, and much larger than anyone would suspect.  It's widely known, that the producers of this film did not do their due diligence in fact checking, and a lot of numbers and references are not accurate. Some is, and like killuhkallyh said, it can be a good resource for people who are not in the know already. However, from the other side of the industry, it was not well received. Many of my clients feel it was way too much information to give out, and made a lot of people's lives more difficult.
LOL'd hard man, ty
KIA Soul.  Not going to buy it.  Will play the commercial again.
He's just gay like that. 
HAHAHAH DISREGARD THAT I SUCK COCKS
right here =D
I don't believe the CIA would need to create this subreddit in the first place. It's not as if conspiracy theorists are never going to talk semi-publicly about their beliefs without COINTELPRO holding their hand.  TPTB portray us as incomprehensible freaks by way of consensus-cracking and broadcasting comically-exaggerated or straw-man renditions of legitimate conspiracy theories. This would be your basic Alex Jones mouthpiece, or your reddit user in conspiracy/politics/worldnews with a comment history of inflammatory circular reasoning and/or headstrong and unsubstantiated support of some mainstream narrative.  It's always a judgement call, and that's what makes it so difficult to separate the shit from the truth. That's what makes it so effective.
troll alert
Here's the question you need to answer: Are you stubborn enough to finish this? Because really, it's a matter of willpower. If you are bound and determined to *finish* the damned thing, regardless of quality, then you're good to go. The lousy plot points and clichés can be fixed in editing later.  If you need a precedent, I'm one. I started a novel in twelfth grade and I didn't finish the first draft for 10 years. I had 80 pages that I kept trying to get right and a subject matter that was frankly too big for me at the time. Various things happened and I had to ask myself if I wanted to continue. I decided that my goal would be to finish no matter how awful it was, and I did. And it was awful. So I revised it, rewrote sections, added new bits, revised it again, repeat, for a couple years. Now it's being workshopped and I'm working on the second draft of another project.   So, are you ready to write a draft you'll never show anyone in order to just *get it done*? Revision is for later.
&gt;The American consume-a-tard epidemic is not global  keep telling yourself that.
I think you are not where you think you are. 
Aubrie Grace.. Hell I don't know now :(
o_0
i DO plan on getting an ssd down the line and i honestly dont even know what ssd caching is. so it seems like a z68 will probably suit my needs better. and im definitely going to get a gpu just havent decided. 
Pretty much this
[Awake](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Awake_%28TV_series%29)
At this point it is between GSP and Silva. I would say the winner fo a fight between the two gets it, or if one of them drops the title, they only get to be the most dominant (weight class) champ in history.
Do... Do you know what APM is?
If you're really interested you can ask him, he's Steve Horwitz, you can find him on Facebook and Google+. All he does is post Rush songs and economics articles.
Yeah, that's how I read it. Shame really - infinite capacity hard disks would be great.
Shit, if i had to download half as much as i used to download, i'd die, mate. free shit's important
Jaffar
Could you possibly sound anymore like a retarded hipster?  At least now I know I'm not even remotely interested in the game.
After watching it a few more times, I agree. He made the greedy mans run which, if Neymars as talented as he looks to be, was the wrong move. He should have ran slightly wider and gone for a left-foot cross as both his box players look to have a height advantage.  Getting a Brazilian striker to do this however, is highly unlikely.
Yeah, that dork is wearing some weird stuff.
I believe the NCVS or Kleck covered on average how many shots were used in self defense and 99.4% of the cases involved no shooting whatsoever and the majority of the rest involved 1 or 2 shots total. I'm not willing to do the leg work because I'm tired, but there's a lead for you.
It begs the question by saying that she "knows every physical fact about color, but doesn't know what it's like to experience it".  *If* it were the case that experiencing it *is* a physical fact, then the story has excluded that as even being possible because of how the scenario was set up.
....how...just wow and how
You didn't piss?!
&gt;I leader should also be judged as much on the things he doesn't do as those he does. I disagree with most things Harper does but he at least hasn't completely ruined the country yet.  I think "hasn't ruined the country yet" is a pretty shitty bar to set for our leaders. Besides, some of the policies will take time. For instance, his approach to social issues and the omnibus crime bill will lead to an increase in crime and criminality as well as enforcement and prison costs, but it will take time before that becomes apparent. By the time we're dealing with the costs his policies in a decade, he'll have retired on a fat pension.
I should be a mod. Because. 
Google Reader.
I've never used one of these but I can't imagine grinding grain by hand to make bread quality flour.  That's what mills are for.
So I'm assuming you also deleted your PayPal account?
aww poor little guy
Why would they do that?
This dude is awsome but i swear every time I see him in a picture it's with his shirt off
That would be fun.  Until your GPS kills Dumbledore!
Nope, I use my Thunderbolt to listen to music on the way to work (about 30 minutes,) then it sits on my desk for 10 or so hours while I respond to the random text or maybe take a call or two, never more than 10 minutes of talking.  I listen to music again on the way home and if I haven't had it plugged in at work I'll have gone from 100% battery to roughly 20-30%.  1.5 days?  Gimme.
Manning actually said "no" to the Colts' offer to make him the highest payed player in the NFL, taking about a $2 million cut per season. [One article about it.](http://aol.sportingnews.com/nfl/story/2011-07-31/peyton-manning-puts-aside-ego-hard-to-hate-that)
After reading this, I take it back, I like your horrid pun.  Damn you for making me like you.  ;P
I was just going to point that out. Barca's DNA is flooding the EPL these days. :P
In Pennsylvania, people call the state Pee Eh.
Yeah I actually learned about this today in another class of mine. Coincidence! i found it really interesting how an entire grove of Aspen trees can be connected and are essentially exact clones of the original tree!
looks like the hourly mario paint post is here
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cluster_headache
Curious, why is this posted by kloosout and not kloo2yoo?
I think it's this banana hammock.
or tapping one of your thumbs knuckle on your bottom teeth will make you feel dizzy
Insulin pump, wallet, Kershaw Leek (knife), Ruger LC9 (pistol, actually lives in a holster, but sometimes in a pocket), and Chapstick, in descending order of priority.  Anything else in my pockets drives me nuts.  Keys go in there if they have to, but I'll often carry them in my hand, and at work or home they're in my desk.  Definitely no change.  I'd rather donate it than carry it.
LOL! Thx for the chuckle!
Words cannot describe the awesomeness!
My EDC is a Kershaw Needs Work.  $32 for my fav. box opener EVAR.  http://imgur.com/nAdje
This sounds stupid, but I ran into it with my current laptop. Mouse over your battery icon and see if it's charging. Mine wasn't charging, and said "plugged in, not charging''. It would make the computer run very very slow and at 100%. I had to unplug it and plug it back it, and sometimes wiggle the cord around to get it to work. The wires at the end of the power cord became work hardened and I had to replace the charger. I was able to open it up and solder the connections correctly but it didn't last very long.   Try this! Good luck
welp....I guess that's about it for G+.
id be happy to be of service also, some better quality pics would be awesome
Actually there wasn't really any beatings. They did coral people and zip tie them, but most were immediately released. They had no problem with the protesters, but there was a bunch of black bloc anarchists who were running around trashing stuff, and ironically trashing privately owned family businesses downtown. Only a handful of people actually got arrested, most were released and free to go.  &gt;Yeah sweet...until they start hitting you for no reason.  Yeah sweet... until the anarchists starting breaking shit and setting stuff on fire for no reason. Also, remember the part of my story where one of the protesters/anarchists lunged at me for no reason? I supposed that's acceptable, but if a cop does it OMG FASCISM AMIRITE? I didn't see anyone get hit or beat, except for one kid who at point blank swung a lead pipe at a cop a couple times. And he didn't get hit per say, just brought to the ground and zip tied pretty quick.  Also *I* didn't get arrested because I wasn't rioting. The cops were pretty nice to me because I wasn't throwing rocks, poop, or trash cans at them. Funny how that works. When a couple asked what I was doing I actually started chit chatting with them, and even got them to pose all badass for a pic. Much like OPs pic.
Chien search
It is all good now, my public reddit face.
it seems like it would cook faster in that pattern, there is more edge space.
I wish I could uptoke this all day, man.
challenge accepted
AOL - Not even once.
It is pretty big.  Its 126 cm  I guess youd have to do some maths to work out scale.  I'd try, but I suck at that
If you are not fapping then you're still a rookie.
Upvote for your car, downvote for "extra manhole".
Batman Begins?  
I guess you're the only one who can see it. Try signing out and see if it's still there.
But that's not normal highlights, it's directly from the sounders. Besides, there's no editorializing in the title. I had to remove a link that had in its title, and I quote, "In case you missed it: Sounders RAVAGE Columbus 6-2."   If it's from an already-editorialized source, that's one thing, but I don't want people editorializing neutral highlights from MLS because it alienates people of the losing team.   Unless you're chicago, in which you alienate no one cause you tie all the things.
***TerrellePryor***:  &gt;[2011/08/31][23:09:18]  &gt;[[Translate]](http://translate.google.com/#auto|auto|Funny thing is I scored a 22 on my Wonderlic. Get it right ask @RosenhausSports 'google translate this tweet'): Funny thing is I scored a 22 on my Wonderlic. Get it right ask [*@RosenhausSports*](https://twitter.com/RosenhausSports 'twitter user profile')  [[This comment was posted by a bot][FAQ]](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/tweet_poster 'tweet_poster FAQ')[[Did I get it wrong?]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=tweet_poster&amp;message=[Oops!](http://reddit.com/r/nfl/comments/k0qz9\) 'report an error')
she says that her wifes parents are really bigoted (my word, projecting maybe? probably) and uncomfortable with their daughter being trans and that when they are around the parents they (the couple and the parents) use this ladies wifes given name and pronouns. She goes on to say:  " It sometimes sticks with me. Luckily my partner doesn't mind... I've got some trans friends that will kick your ass for using the wrong pronoun though! " So they are aware of the affect misgendering has at least.  Also, I totally second your sentiment in totally not being cool with being called 'daddy' fuuuck thaaaaat, your own kid? damn!   
I think Latin would be very fun to know without doing any of the work to learn it.
My boner.
Upvoted!  Good luck in your search!
I just carry keys to my lamborghini, a pack of extra big condoms, my hospital pager, noble prize certificate, picture of my girlfriend, picture of my other girlfriend, keys to my houses, pen and paper for the autographs, a pocketful of friendship bands, bandage for the cut on my 6 pack I've received after trying to save a teenager from a mob of racist homophobes, gps for my yacht, treats for my dogs, change for homeless, reddit alien keychain and a phone.
I will trade you a S. Sniper for the goggles?
Serendipity
If I was that kid with the birthday I would have cried so many happy tears on that fateful day.
I like Ducati.
[](/lol "i dun goof'd")
Mother fucker, wait it might be cheaper than a 975 skin.
latin, id go around speaking in toungues scaring the crap out of very religious people.
**TIGHT** tights!
Yes, because Textbooks are so much easier to search though in pdf format.
My first car was a Nissan Sentra... I didn't think it was stupid...
if you're using an external mouse they assume the external keyboard too which has usb ports on the sides making the small cord much more user friendly. 
Who says "we" want to watch anyone suffer?
props and upvotes to everyone who just made Eddie Izzard references whether they knew it or not
He's trying too hard. But at least he's trying. Look like he's almost imitating scotch reviewer Ralfy. 
I guess you'll need some Ackbar ice-soap to clean up with afterward? Bleach and chili are messy. 
Walther PPK just in case.
That's a fantastic idea 
leave the poor fishies alone and hunt the ultimate prey, human
Oh hot damn I like that.
like plunging the needle directly into the nerves of your tooth?  I just shit myself. 
really? I went to the mesa dmv to get a new drivers license and i was in there for a good three hours or more... 
Ok, try it again...can you say "professional capacity"? As in has Obama in his professional capacity endorsed another religion over another or whined about "the war on Christmas" No? Thank you for playing. Good day. 
I went to community college and got that paid for. When I went to a 4 year I was old enough to get that paid for with government grants. I plan on getting my PhD and I am pretty sure every program I am looking at pays around $2000USD a month plus benefits. 
Man, you have issues.
THANK YOU! the ENTIRE time I was watching the episode I was screaming that its just a magical penis and balls!
Did you not read the article? She couldn't find anything to wear! That baby's lucky she wasn't having a bad hair day too, the little asshole.
Check out this guys route through England and parts of Europe (zoom way out)  [Crazy Guy on a Bike](http://www.crazyguyonabike.com/doc/page/?o=1r4vFZo&amp;page_id=137259&amp;v=1R)  Also take time to read his trials and repairs.   There is one section where he rode halfway up a mountain, his chain broke, he broke his chain tool and decided to freewheel it all the way back to the town he came from to get a new chain.
Dont, Monster Rancher will Always own pokemanz.
Dat glass.
I'll believe that when I hear it from a less sensationalist publication.
recipe just called 'em 'yeast dinner rolls'.
I want him.
i think lychees taste kind of like sweet grapes.  This is probably yummy.  I'm going to find some and try it.  
Yes i have, but i won't tell :)
it's very plausible. i recommend doing it, because fillers will just piss you off and make you forgot what was going on in the real plot and confuse you by giving hinata weird one time jutsu's where it looks like lazers are coming out of her hands
&gt; First, I am extremely surprised that so many people in this thread are bringing in dogs and cats. It is not even remotely a close comparison. Human life is infinitely more important.  This is a matter of opinion; many people strongly disagree.  Even the world disagrees.  To ask a silly, extremist question, why are you spending money on dog food when an infinitely more important human life is being threatened by starvation?  Even if we avoid the nitpicky question, what does "more important" mean?  Some ask why pets aren't kept alive in torment while the more important humans are.  Is the duration that much more important than the quality?  If so, where do we draw the line?  Should we keep people with no hope of recovery on life support until massive cellular death occurs?  &gt; I am extremely against making it mandatory (for doctors or pharmacists or any other profession).  I understand your point and, even though I'm pro-euthanasia, I don't think it's fair to force medical practitioners to do this, either.  However, I expect that there will be some practitioners, like Dr. Jack Kevorkian, that would be willing to undertake this difficult task.  Would you be okay with self-selected specialists performing this task?
I am intrigued by this question, and I don't know the answer.  I'm going to do some research on this tonight and get back to you.  If I can't find anything, I'm going to ask a colleague of mine about it tomorrow.  My current guess:  Regular air +  volatilized aromatics from the pepper itself  ~~If the pepper is green, then I would expect there to be more oxygen inside the pepper than outside because of photosynthesis~~.  Turns out the opposite is true.  ethylene from the maturing fruit  Other than that, I don't know.  I wouldn't be surprised if there was some sort of secondary metabolite to prevent microbes and insects from living inside the locule (empty space) of the pepper/pumpkin.  As far as creating a gas to inflate it, there is gas exchange with the air outside the fruit, so that would not be a problem.  Edit:  Abstract of Blaskiak et al. 2006:  &gt;Seeds developing within a locular space inside hollow fruit experience chronic exposure to a unique gaseous environment. Using two pepper cultivars, `Triton' (sweet) and `PI 140367' (hot), we investigated how the development of seeds is affected by the gases surrounding them. The atmospheric composition of the seed environment was characterized during development by analysis of samples withdrawn from the fruit locule with a gas-tight syringe. As seed weight plateaued during development, the seed environment reached its lowest O-2 concentration (19%) and highest CO, concentration (3%). We experimentally manipulated the seed environment by passing different humidified gas mixtures through the fruit locule at a rate of 60 to 90 mL center dot min(-1). A synthetic atmosphere containing 3% CO, 21% O-2, and 76% N-2 was used to represent a standard seed environment. Seeds developing inside locules supplied with this mixture had enhanced average seed weight, characterized by lower variation than in the no-flow controls due to fewer low-weight seeds. The importance of O-2 in the seed microenvironment was demonstrated by reduction in seed weight when the synthetic atmosphere contained only 15% O-2 and by complete arrest of embryo development when O-2 was omitted from the seed atmosphere. Removal of CO2 from the synthetic atmosphere had no effect on seed weight, however, the CO2-free treatment accelerated fruit ripening by 4 days in the hot pepper. In the sweet peppers, fruit wall starch and sucrose were reduced by the CO2-free treatment. The results demonstrate that accretionary seed growth is being limited in pepper by O-2 availability and suggest that variation in seed quality is attributable to localized limitations in O-2 supply.  tl;dr:  The balance of CO2 and O2 in the locule of a pepper plant controls the rate of fruit maturation, seed weight, and the starches and sugar content of the ovary wall of the sweet pepper, but not the hot pepper.  From Almeida and Huber 2001:  &gt;Apertures ranging from 18-31 mum in width and 33-41 mum in length, with densities ranging from 6.7 to 47.9 apertures . mm(-2) were observed in the endocarp of mature-green fruit. These apertures were progressively occluded during early ripening and were absent in late ripening fruit. Aperture occlusion might result in reduced gas exchange between the locule and external fruit atmosphere, resulting in modification of the locular gas composition.   tl;dr:  The structures that regulate gas exchange between the outside environment and the locule of a ripening fruit constrict in the intermediate stage of ripening.  So the answer to your question would vary depending on what stage of development the fruit was in.  Interesting, in the silique (fruit) of canola, the plant regulates for high levels of CO2 (Musgrave et al. 2007),  &gt;The Brassica rapa L. silique is a self-contained environment that maintains hypoxia around the developing seeds, and in which carbon dioxide accumulates to very high concentrations (&gt;30,000 ppm).  It seems that this is to regulate the production of lipids in the seed.
He's only been here 3 months. Give him some time.
Well, I learn something new every day. That is her. But I've always seen her with a different name (Kathy Lee).
I split it into jhere-row. I'm pretty sure I'm wrong haha
OMG THAT FACE  I actually snorted aloud
Somewhere, John goodman is scratching his head.
Or try this, make a fist with your thumb inside of it.  Now u have no gag reflexes.
hypocrisy is hilarious.  good day.
I've always wanted to try Cuba, Puerto Rico, or Jamaica. I heard Puerto Rico is the way to go due to ease of travel.
I'd like to see an Akira class ship named Normandy.
Any one in particular you recommend or are they all the same blend(seems like that to me)?
My girlfriend got me that set for my 28th birthday.   I've never had a moment that brought me back to childhood quite like opening it up and dumping the pieces into a tray.
Crysis 2 came out this year... 
I was bullied for almost all of elementary school and some of middle school. I remembering holding a lot of it in, and not telling anyone. That led to a lot of problems. So first, I'd say go in and talk to the principal about reducing the consequences. Then I'd suggest that you have your son talk to his counselors about what's happening in his class. Having him interact with administration and dealing with problems by himself will help him in the long run. Have him talk to his teacher and see if he could be moved to another area of the class, away from the kids he identifies as bullying him. Lastly, I suggest that you get him involved in something. An activity where he will be accepted and have a strong friends base will help. I'd suggest clubs like key club, red cross, or maybe even debate team. Or, get him involved in band/orchestra, tennis, or what have you. A lot of these organisations impart a greater sense of purpose and belonging, which will help your son from playing the victim in the four year drama we know as high school.   I stress the need of being proactive, because when I was bullied I remember acting the victim instead of looking at ways to do stuff about it. I'm thankful I shed that unfortunate attitude and I enjoyed my four years of high school very much.
IMO, you have already bought it so if you have any problems just download a pirated version.   But I have never used an actual version of windows so I can't comment on if it will work. Just try it and if it does not work out get a crack. I can help if you need more info.
My point being SO is ambiguous enough to encompasses it all.
Thanks, I tend to gain it very evenly and there's a decent amount of muscle under there as well. I really didn't notice I'd gained so much summerBBQweight until I started getting comments on my ass.
Health services in the US is a Consumer product. The sick and dieing are just consumers, the deregulation was so they can "shop" for their best care supposedly more competition would bring prices down and make for better services, and government oversight would tie your life to govt buerocrats which is supposed to be bad right? The only problem is that this type of thing doesn't happen in countries where healthcare is a "public service" I could go on all night about how bad the US healthcare system is but the voters really have the say, and they refuse to act.
The bottom right one is very very hot...
true, but not everyone is like that in the class of 2012, im in the class of 2013, raised catholic. recently read the god delusion and am beginning my life as a friendly neighborhood atheist.
8-|
abebooks.com
Aww geez. I love everything about this.
export zipped looped package,and save project bones,and anything from shared data in "my documents/image line....
Weirddddd.
You've got an amazingly proportionate, feminine, curvalicious body (and dat flat tummy, hnnng). As a fellow wide-shouldered and wide-hipped girl, I'd like to second the suggestion for a-line skirts. They make you look and feel dainty and feminine and balance nicely with strong shoulders. Shirt dresses and wrap dresses also work really well, especially with 3/4-length sleeves. I'd suggest avoiding cap sleeves, because they emphasize your shoulders and can make you look linebacker-esque. I also really like the shirt in the center picture; the scoop neck and the rich blue really seem to work for you.  All in all, you're young and gorgeous. Have fun! It's really easy to get caught up in your own perceived flaws, but no one's perfect and life is way too short to spend it worrying about little things most people probably won't even notice.
I dont want to get up to push the start button on the dryer again, and my clothes arent quite dry yet.
One can easily argue that the framers didn't intend the 1st amendment to apply to the Internet, Weblogs, E-mail, Television, Podcasts, Radio or any recent advance yet it has been found to do so by our courts as well as by most reasoned and well-regulated people.
The Laguna Seca superbike race in 1977 or 78 was dedicated to George.  One of my coworkers at Los Angeles DWP told me about it.  When George came to L.A. from NJ, he tried to get onto the LAPD but couldn't.  Then he and my coworker took the civil service test for DWP and George didn't get that either...
nah.  he shouldn't.  his kid will then grow up thinking they have some talent that will just go untapped once they realize its not just what you know, but how you use it.   The only thing that matters is results. Effort is just another word. 
They "laugh their heads off."  If you read the passage we are alluding to, you will see that the men mention removing heads... particularly the maiden's heads... maidenhead... virginity.  This is why it is vague.  Always glad to teach someone though.
I had always thought this picture was fake, there was no way Zack would let his girlfriend pose like that.
So in about four or five generations most, if not all the protected surnames will become unprotected and will switch places the current common ones? Nice time-bomb prank your ancestors pulled, I like it.
Yeah!  How dare those assholes do their jobs by asking you if you want to buy something else?  Seriously, who do they think they are?  People being paid to do a job?  Fuck no. Ring up my order, check-out robot. I see you talking to me, but I will just stare blankly at your dumb mouth because you are at work so I am superior to you.  Seriously, if these people wanted to be treated like humans, they shouldn't work retail, am I right?
Thats just for pancreatic cancer. Lots of other cancers are usually visible to a trained physician before it's too late...
Yeah, I know. But this feels different for some reason. They assume I like the weird glam rock stuff when I like something completely different.  [Sigh...](http://captionsearch.com/pix/i3onxhee.gif)
Yup
Obviously you have no idea what you're talking about.  Without the FCC testing on all consumer electronics, most would emit EM radiation that interfere with other devices.  Learn how and why these things work before bitching about them.  Without rules about what spectrum these devices could transmit on we would have had jets dropping from the sky (back before proper shielding and better transmission techniques).  The same reasoning is still applicable just to other issues.  But yes, regulatory capture is a problem and quite prevalent in the US government.  
Uptoke rollover! But i think it might be better if they expire. That way you will know to use them or they are gone. If they remain, people who don't upvote much will have thousands and thousands saved up. Maybe put a limit on how many you can have or have it expire after a week or so.   We might have a new uptoke currency on our hands lol. 
happy days.
and? Religion is the rock that scumbags like the church members described by the OP hide under. Just because bad people *may* find another rock to hind under does not mean we should't cast this hiding place aside.
Why use a credit when you can take the class and use it as a GPA booster/more sane class that lets you focus on other courses?  [former IB student here who graduated with a 4.0 GPA from a science undergrad program]
No.  Well, I mean, that's how you are *supposed* to disassemble it.  You could probably saw through it or something.
not really.  it was to boast about the great educational system we have in the united states of America, which is routinely the brunt of many jokes.  Whether explicit or implied, many boast about the educational systems in the other country to denigrate the United States.  I was just showing some love for the US of A and also pointing out that his accomplishment is neither unique nor ground breaking.   So no the whole point of my post was not to brag.  Sorry you took it that way.   Insecure much?
How so?  I'm interested to know how you use it.  
That was quite the monologue, sir.
My boner.
Great buy. Needed a young striker anyways, should see a lot of playing time in the Bundesliga if/when Raul/Huntelaar need rests. Got rid of Gavranovic on load for him, so not too shabby all around. Hopefully he gets playing time this weekend, would love to see him in royal blue.
Dang. I figured I'd have better luck filtering out teenagers in here.
So basically Riverini is just making shit up?
Consider using InstaDMG (and InstaUp2Date) and DeployStudio.  If you haven't used the tools before you might not have time to learn them before this weekend, but they're amazing.  Between those and Apple Remote Desktop, you can cover a huge amount of ground in short time.  Good luck!
Who do you not have and what class do you want to play?
My first car was a Nissan Sentra... I didn't think it was stupid...
[Thanks SpeedingTurtle](http://i.imgur.com/zN5vP.jpg)
I'm still wicked pissed about all the light rail in the valley being taken out for a fraking busway. It hasn't helped the congestion AT ALL.
THIS IS UHMERICUH. WE DUN LIKE THAT COMMUNIST WURDZ
I heard that they can attach braces to the backs of your teeth making them invisible. Or get a job and help pay for the invisiline ones. Also, they do suck. I had them for 5 years, 3rd through 8th grade. So glad I go them off before high school!
Hey Sean,  I live in downtown Los Angeles (where you live I think). What's your favorite place to eat around here?
It's Fox News.  They're just dead wrong.  Deal with them the same way you deal with trolls.  If you ignore them hopefully they'll go away; if not, you'll still be ignoring them, so nothing to worry about either.
Sure.  I can't say I'm really depressed by it at all.  In fact, I don't feel bad at all.  I haven't had sex and there's nothing wrong with that.
Upvote for Gunners!
360 alley oop dunk. dang
You should be flushing longer.
I'd say fuck you too. You have to pay to be a part of a club and then you have to pay even more because of e-bay flippers? Why didn't they just re-evaluate the manner in which they sold the albums? Why didn't they come up with a better system that would allow them to maintain control over distribution? They could easily do that with limited run vinyl - card holders have release numbers logged when they are purchased. IF you're caught selling on E-Bay within 6 months of release, your purchase power is taken away. This would keep the price down for fans as well as keep those snagging albums to flip at bay. There were other ways of fixing the problem that did not involved taking more money from fans.
adorable... although it is mating behavior.  
Link?
still works fine on my machines.
You honestly think you can hit him in the pocket book? I'm buying it because I want it.  There were going to be changes to the originals I didn't want on the disc one way or the other.  Now there's just a couple of more. Do I want new versions of the originals on Blu-ray?  Sure.  Will I ever watch them?  No.  I have the DVDs and the Laserdiscs of the originals and ALWAYS watch the Special Edition.  So it goes.
*Niga Yuh gi anja*
Atlanta Botanical Gardens always needs help and it's pretty easy and fun. I go every few weekends. You get to be outside in the beautiful garden and basically just tell people about a certain area. Shifts are 3 hours, morning or afternoons on weekends, and they have stuff during the week if you're available. 
Awesome link thx
Fuck the person who downvoted you!
Upvote this up so people can see it.  -not powercow
GET DOWN AGAIN!
Honestly, I have one and I really don't use it often. Since it vaporizes the weed at a lower certain temperature it gives you a primarily THC high which makes you feel like a zombie. I prefer the THC mixed with CBD's and other compounds that smoking delivers. However it really saves a lot of bud
Great, now people can consume thousands of calories  without even having to make the minimum effort of walking into Mcdonalds.  For some people that's probably exercise. 
Unsurprisingly, anything free and public in downtown Vancouver is going to be used by the homeless.  I'm surprised however at a bunch of 20-something homeless people.  I'd be very curious to learn what their circumstance is and what they're doing on the streets.  
I have Flash disabled in my desktop browsers on both Windows and OSX.  FYI
Do you stand still in storms?  Then you deserve to lose everything.  Stimmed bio stop-micro is STILL a faster movement speed than high templar.
yea, but I put it there
I WAS JUST ABOUT TO POINT THIS OUT :3 
Classy as fuck too
how fast can you get one mailed to san diego?  
Fuck you too buddy. Also good job. 
That was the funniest number 3 I've ever seen. I didnt know numbers could be so funny
I'm leaning towards the company being innocent.  Their customer gave them permission to capture any and all data across the device.  Trespassing on someone's property and then claiming that you suffered a loss of privacy is a non-starter to me.  Trespassing is trespassing whether or not you were aware of it.   
91.24% you say? I'll take it
For those of you that havent seen it, a few years ago they came out with a MW5 trailer....and without further ado: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=orhOvbfyyJw  There is a big legal battle going on or at least there was last time i checked, we may never see this hit the light of day.
I've lost my patience with you one-a-day "none of you are ugly" posters who undermine the entire point of this subreddit!  People will always feel subconscious about themselves to a degree. This subreddit serves as an ego-boost to most of us!
I lol'd but only at how fucking gay that joke was.
have you tried pantry magic?  they have a lot of kitchenware that you cant find anywhere else in HK, if they dont have it they may be able to point you in the right direction.   also you could try and harvest your own yeast.  I did this a few years ago to make sourdough bread.  its pretty easy, although Im not sure how the humidity here would effect it.   http://www.pantry-magic.com/
Pompous.
Pretty sure our new management wants to forget the hodgson era as fast as possible.
If you think you're insane, you're probably not.
I could pass off the lack of sleep, since I have bags under my eyes from only sleeping 4 or 5 hours a night.   Could I say that I have social anxiety and interacting with people is often very difficult for me? In high school, I used to smoke all the time and it was very easy to interact with people. I stopped smoking at one point and my grades dropped rather dramatically one semester.
That gag is so old, it predates the Internet: notice how the print is actually typeset?!
I'd go for either Bowmaster or Corsair then. I guess Mechanics are decent in that respect too, they just never appealed to me. Outlaws (3rd job Gunslingers) aren't particularly great, so you might be discouraged on the way to 4th job.   Warriors, Archers and Mages will be receiving a buff in the upcoming Jump patch, so that might be incentive for you to make a Bowmaster :P (They get a double jump skill and a reasonable damage boost)
I love you. What's the creepiest thing I can do to show my affection?
I was in there yesterday playing! Pandacraze.932. Any sort of central location for discussion/events for players up there?
I'm not super in love with Jay-Z's music but I think he's a super classy guy. 
Thats enough for a pizza and you get the satisfaction of knowing you earned it.
Woot.
To which I would reply:  Repent! ignorance of the bible is no excuse for sin!
I try to avoid small talk at all costs. 
Kill it with... nm
are you on evom? 
could not upvote fast enough. good god.
I never realized he had six fingers on each hand
&gt;the debate is why should money that has already been taxed be taxed again when someone dies?  I didn't realize we were talking about inheritance tax.  News to me.
Given what we've been given with the previous 52 series, I would say "no, 52 is not a good place for anyone that's new to DC Comics to get into."
students get to download the Adobe Creative Suite: Design Premium aka photoshop, illustrator, dreamweaver, fireworks etc! Really fucking cool :D   I can't wait
How will ACL repair make your hamstring weaker?
why I cant get a girl lol
&gt; But if you put it on the bag it came in you should be safe.  Those bags act like a faraday cage.  Read the link and realise why you definitely shouldn't put them on thoses bags
It's a shame the light can't leak out and safen up the surrounding area, but the darkness around it really highlights the sweet glowing water effect. Totally stealing that idea if I have a half-slab protected area I can work it into.
God that looks tasty
I'd say anything written by Charlie Kaufman, really. Adaptation and Synecdoche, New York for sure.
Thank you! :]   Could you answer a quick question for me? It would really help:   What part of the original comment made you want to delete the post?  Is there another way I could have worded the bot so it's friendlier?   I really don't want to make people feel bad for posting a previously-popular image.  Any feedback you can give me is helpful.   Thanks.
YESSSSSSSSSSSSSSS
100000 reposts later...
yawn ...   you are proving my point exactly ...  we all have our own personal opinions of what attractiveness is ... and anyone who suggests they find a 450lb balding shut in with sores attractive is lying through their teeth
Thanks for that, I always assumed it was 401 thousand something! 
That is one BIG guy behind them x.x
What's so goddamn funny?
I have brought shame to my family :(
Finished reading this book recently and it changed my effing life.
Eh, lambics are pretty awesome.  As well as Great Divide's Wild Raspberry Ale, 
*frap frap frap frap frap*
Ok.  Post a few more if you'd like.....
What about the great god of the lazy, Yakubu?
Then you have to draw the line on who is smart enough to live and who gets tested on.   The people on the border probably wouldn't like that very much.
She's quite a successfull British Actress, [Shirley Henderson](http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0376602/), as with most of the cast of the films.
Oh yeah, that's probably what happened.  I was just thinking Arena Trap and Shadow Tag; I forgot about the trap moves.
HOW THE FUCK DID YOU ANIMATE A JPG??? I'm going to kill myself now.
River Island do some nice shirts.
Dude thank you so much this looks awesome
Not thoroughly convinced I should have posted this here... on the other hand I'm not sure where else it would fit... :-s
I don't think you can fairly say either was the "villain" in Fall Weather Friends; they both got overly competitive, and both were making poor decisions, friendship-wise. The same goes for Look Before You Sleep, which is about letting petty differences (on both sides) get between friends; it was not about Rarity learning a lesson from a flawless Applejack. Both parties were meant to be in the wrong in both episodes.  With that said, I think the problem with Applejack is that she's the most "down to Earth" character, with the fewest entertaining quirks. Don't get me wrong, I still like her and she's a very likable character; it's just that the others all have so much going for them, intrigue-wise (from an audience's perspective). My two bits.
Ill let her know you miss her
It was at some shitty cafe I worked in Chicago.   I never actually told them to suck it, it was more of an internal struggle.  Was there some sass in that tone of yours?
They're not bound to any directories. It'd be pointless for these machines.
French, because it would make my current semester *so* much easier. Plus I could put that on my resume and stuff, and travel to France and never have to worry about miscommunication. 
Mashed Potatoes. Because different kinds of media go on it.
I do the exact same thing. It settles my mind. No more depression. Not exactly happiness either. More of a universal acceptance. 
I'm assuming North America, because the ambassador certificate is downloaded the same way as the ambassador games are.
Metric?!?! Who uses that? It's 8-10 lbs for the *rest* of the world. ;)
Take it back! SAY I'M NOT NUMBER 2!
Not at, but very near, let's plan to do somewhere on campus with specifics worked out once the workload starts to ramp up.  Oh and I'm also busy, I'm hoping having some meatspace interaction will increase our likelihood of success :)
The Bay Area consists of the counties that touch the SF bay at some point. Good thing you rested your case bro.
Right, but people stopped using Trapper Keepers for a period of time (Forever?) and I was stuck in that stupid transitional period of not knowing wtf to have.
Quite a coincidence this question comes up on the first week of school. Feeling bitter and slighted?  My gen eds were enjoyable and somewhat invaluable. It also gives you an idea of what you want to do, because it's hard to get it right going in blindly. Take a psych class, and you may end up like 90% of freshman girls and declare a psych major because you "want to work with kids" or (the child of divorce) "want to be a therapist and help families."
Add it to the soundcloud group, so we'll still have it after this post fades.  http://soundcloud.com/groups/r-trees
LoL and TF2 will run great, but anything heavier than that will run like ass. Just upgrade your desktop for those.
You should keep working on your running and come join us in r/running.
Are you selling the Machina?
Just below it http://brisbane.craigslist.com.au/clo/2569622914.html  For a touch of class &gt; cum stain on the inside 
After watching the Au Vs Nz match, then the England Vs Ireland match the other weekend, I really cant see northern hemisphere teams being serious contenders to make the final.  The RWC is a different game of course, and the style of refereeing will have a large impact on the flow of the games and how teams perform, but those two games were like chalk and cheese.
Don't think hohead was questioning if you have migraines or not, just commenting that the chiropractor visit might be the placebo effect at play there.
Surely spaghetti westerns would give you a hint that we love the stuff?
That's what I made this new [subreddit](http://asfs.reedit.com) for, if it takes off you'll always have fresh internets!
the icon adapted to our tastes my dear watson.  The pineapple is a symbol for hospitality, something us ents take pride in. the pineapple is FUCKING delicious when high and is Fucking delicious when not high.  me:"the pineapple is great, yay!" croud of ents:(in unison)"YAY!"
At least one 1-bedroom condo in my building went for about $60k because the owner went into foreclosure. Our building is relatively nice and our association is fiscally sound, though it's not the best neighborhood in Chicago.   My guess is that anything at the $40k or even $20k level is a short sale or foreclosure. There's no harm in looking at such a place, just be sure to figure out why it's so cheap. It could be a desperate seller, or it could be a property with severe problems.
HI HO DIGGITY.
same here... 
This is true. I am a guy and I used to work retail and when I was talking to an attractive girl it was only to make a sale. This happens to absolutely all people at work without exception, punch the time clock turn off your hormones. Thats why people who work together will never develop romantic relationships with co-workers. &lt;/stupid comment&gt;
Ummmm.... Wow
Got a light?
and this was the day I unsubscribed from r/trees
&gt;the founder and director of Personhood Mississippi is far-right extremist Les Riley. Riley used to be a featured blogger for the Christian separatist group Christian Exodus, until his posts were conspicuously removed from the group’s site. But luckily, he left a paper trail:  &gt;According to Christian Exodus’s mission statement, “The initial goal was to move thousands of Christian constitutionalists to South Carolina to accelerate the return to self-government based upon Christian principles at the local and State level. This project continues to this day, with the ultimate goal of forming an independent Christian nation that will survive after the decline and fall of the financially and morally bankrupt American empire.
What limited demand side we actually implemented did work. Check the CBO studies. No, it did not put us in trillions of dollas of debt, good of you to notice that. You are again wrong about the jobs, check the CBO.  Truth is about half the stimulus was supply side and that half did nothing at all for the economy. The rest was demand side but way too small to get us out of the rut. What effect it did have, however, was positive. 
Crank them up to f8 and they'll be pretty fantastic for what you're doing.   I disagree with some other posters. Don't buy up as soon as you aren't happy with the lenses: buy up when you understand why you're unhappy with the lenses, when you understand what their limitations are and why you'd benefit from better glass. 
Im going to school with the same people who ive been going to school with for 5 years and who look down on me, yay!
I read this in Artosis's voice. 
Yep, r/random sent me here too. 
&gt;Under U.S. law the fleeing felon rule was limited to non-lethal force in most cases by Tennessee v. Garner, 471 U.S. 1 (1985). The justices held that deadly force "may not be used unless necessary to prevent the escape and the officer has probable cause to believe that the suspect poses a significant threat of death or serious physical injury to the officer or others."  As said before, this is a restriction on law enforcement due to the "seizure" provision of the original judgement.  It also does not apply due to the fact that the guy that was shot had committed a violent felony. Lethal force was lawful in preventing his escape.  State v Weddle does not apply. No jurisdiction. Nevada law does not affect W.Va law.  I'm trying to find a decent online version of english common law but it is a PITA. Generally publishers do not put full law books online due to the loss of revenue.  So here is your reference, look it up yourself. It is also the reference that the SCOTUS used for the fleeing felon rule in Tennessee V. Garner which you have already accepted by using it in your argument.  Edit to add: I took a bit of pity. It's towards the middle.  http://www.archive.org/stream/historiaplacitor01hale/historiaplacitor01hale_djvu.txt  M. Hale, Historia Placitorum Coronae 85 (1736)  Good luck. Your ball
needs more trollfaces /ragefaces / "FAIL"s and arrows indicating the location of the "FAIL"
Helmets aren't a preventative measure. They will not stop you from getting in accidents.
[](/b22 "Preci what?")
Only if was reversed and you somehow made the bank a ridiculous amount of money... then it'd be a case of scotch, a bundle of hookers, and some sweet tax cuts.
I always feel kind o weird when I realize I am not my body nor am I my brain, ...but instead a collection of smaller creatures, electrical signals, and chemical compounds. Especially ther former...most people consider themselves one life, but really you are just lots of little lives.
First rule of reddit: Do talk about reddit
You're welcome! But a bigger thanks is in order for all the great responses I've received! I've been meaning to do something more productive with my down time for a while now - it's time to finally get started.
I'm so buying that.
Time for a "raid"! Use that spray!! 
I don't know why, but hearing about teachers like this always makes me want to cry.  My favorite teacher in high school was definitely one who ran the classroom by force of personality, and I loved his personality. Even as a Freshman, I could tell he'd seen and dealt with many difficult students. As a result, he called the entire Freshman student body "Ugly Freshmen." I met him during registration, and when my mother and I shook his hand as we left the building, I turned around and walked back to him and said, "Mr. C, is there any way that I can get into your English class this year?" And he told me, "I'd be honored to have the most eager, and seemingly intelligent "ugly Freshman" I've had the pleasure of meeting so far this year, but I'm not allowed to request particular students." I frowned and started to walk away, turned back, and he waved and winked.  I did end up in his Freshman class, and he had quite a way with kids, despite the fact that he referred to his students as "Ugly Freshmen." I sat in the front row all year. Met one of my best friends in his class. None of my other teachers got this treatment from me. I learned a lot of things from him that didn't even necessarily have to do with English, as well... mostly things about life, and learning to think before I speak. I still have a bit of a problem sticking my foot in my mouth (it used to be way worse), but I remember him telling me that I'd improved a lot. Mainly, he said he could see my face contorting and working to hold back what I wanted to say, and working it into something intelligent to say to someone in a way that was insulting, but subtly so. I guess this article kind of reminded me of Mr. C.
I think he used to, but based on his last couple of albums, I can't really disagree. That's why he still does hot guest verses - somebody else chose the beat. 
Move over [snail](http://i.imgur.com/uyaee.jpg), slug is in town.
 I use Tank! As my alarm clock song. When the video started playing I started frantically clicking on the off button, and then pulled an "Oh. Oh, right."
Hey, thanks so much for sharing your concerns! I'll do my best to answer your questions, although I am by no means an expert (more of an enthusiast).  1) I agree support is a HUGE issue. Google Apps for Education is really good about setting up a support framework to ensure that their customers are happy...the best way to gain traction and legitimacy is to make sure current customers are satisfied. [Here](http://www.google.com/support/a/bin/static.py?page=contacting_support.html) is a link to their support page. Each school is set up with an account manager at Google. In the event of a mission-critical emergency, an engineer will be paged 24/7. As far as individual support goes, I have to disagree that Google has "absolutely zero customer service." I've always been able to file bugs/offer feedback knowing that a live engineer would follow up. Plus, OIT would be well-trained to monitor and offer solutions.  2) I just sent an email to State's Google rep to see how they handled/are handling the situation you mentioned. One solution I enjoy is using Chrome's incognito mode, which allows me to log into multiple accounts. As far as benefits outweighing it, a school gmail account would allow professors to create/share calendars/docs/groups/surveys/etc directly. That just begins to skim the surface of possibilities.  3) It's definitely possible. A quick search of "pine gmail" returns a lot of solutions that people have found, but I can't speak from experience. Here's [one](https://groups.google.com/forum/#!topic/comp.mail.pine/RIlBBiUQDLM) that seems promising, but it does look like there would be some setup involved.  Edit: As a follow-up, [here's the link](http://google.ncsu.edu/announcement/announcement-new-google-apps-infrastructure) that State's rep shared with me that you might find useful to read. The challenge that students are finding there relate to the multiple-sign-in feature, which is an opt-in system. It's apparently a few steps to set-up, but then works seamlessly. It's the closest thing to allowing linked accounts, which would be a huge privacy/data ownership issue. I believe there are things in the work to make the transition smoother.
For exploring psychedelics, just dose low in a warm, happy environment with friends you trust. Especially mushrooms.  Prepare for the most satisfying and prolonged belly laughs you will ever experience.
Good tip!  I already did it a few weeks ago.  American Express took care of it in less than 5 minutes, Key Bank was a little slower but not by much, and Chase took 15.  It was interesting to experience the difference in customer service because I was essentially asking three different banks to perform the same task for me, with all calls placed consecutively. 
Still no relief for those of us on the 60 between the 605 and 710 :(
You need a space inbetween your lines to get paragraphs.  r/politics
sony do this on purpose
...eagerly awaiting an answer to your post from down under, deridingly telling you that this isn't a spider,  and providing a picture of some nightmarish local fauna,  the size of a house cat,  with poisonous fangs and all,  that they keep as pets out there, as an example of what is considered to be a proper spider by real men.
Good movie. I just watched it based on your recommendation.
:(
This obviously belongs in [r/MorganFreeman](http://reddit.com/r/morganfreeman)...
Sorry, *therapy*? Because their parents are a little weird? (Whose aren't?)  &gt; Fine I don't care, could you not wait till your children were grown ups and out of the house?  Is it going to be less traumatic once they're in college, so they don't know anything, and suddenly they're home for Christmas and Daddy is now Mommy?  FWIW, I'm a straight caucasian male, so I've got no stake in the matter...  But [read this](http://www.misfile.com/?page=1). They didn't ask to be the "wrong" gender, either, and it's my understanding that this is what it feels like for many people. I know that if you asked me to be a woman for "just a few years", just so my kids didn't get teased at school, I'd ask if you were out of your fucking mind.  Would you say the same thing if they were a gay couple? Just... what... don't get married until the kids are out of the house? Or would you *encourage* transgender crap in that case to "fix" the problem?  The problem is the taunting and bullying, and a society in which children supposedly need therapy because their parents are true to themselves.
I could really go for some chicken strips right now.
id love to join. my yahoo email is tauren.kristich@yahoo.com send me an invite?
he's a dick for more than just that, he and Mr Edge (who is the least edgy person i could imagine) both don't pay their taxes.   What's the difference between Bono and God? God doesn't walk around Dublin thinking he's Bono.
[Cool story, bro.](http://twitter.com/#!/danawhite/status/108639399788544000)
Best username ever.
My dad and his friends in college once dragged a dead sea lion into some staff member's parking space.  By comparison, my level of college antics has been abysmal.
sounds delicious!  How does it look sliced?
I don't understand how it won't make more money, unless people are somehow holding on to the ridiculous notion that if you have a playoff, you can't have bowl games, too.
True.  I included it since it has a relatively high ABV.
If pirates had their way, piracy wouldn't exist..
seeing as I have a choice between some shitstain republican and obama, Obama seems to be the only choice I have. 
if you have ANY random weapon to throw in, you have a deal.
Male opinion here - not trying to win points, kiss ass, or anything like that... it's just annoying to me personally that somehow biologically or socially or otherwise - the stereotype is that men chase based on looks alone, or very specific features of a woman's body alone, and women are left to feel inadequate in some way because of it... if the world worked the way I wanted it to, the standards of attraction would be more of a "whole package" thing..  I guess to me it's pretty sad that any woman would feel less of herself for having small breasts - I understand why it would be hard (to some extent) I just wish the world was a place where we all could feel comfortable with our own bodies and not have to worry about feeling like shit because to someone else, we might not "add up"  I think the beauty of a woman is more than just skin and bones, it's everything, personality, energy, humor, inspiration... we all get old and wrinkled and saggy sooner or later... there's so much more to enjoy about a woman than just her boobs.... just sayin :) I'm sure you're beautiful and your boyfriend wants you to feel that way, too.   Having a small chest may make you feel inferior if you compare yourself to others, so I hope you can gain some confidence to realize that you are a woman, and that in itself is a pretty amazing and beautiful thing. Feel better :)
Cannot unsee.
Who gives a fuck about Glenn Beck? I hope the media shill ends up in some back alley all alone, talking to himself with only a blackboard; chalk, and sipping a paper-bagged 40 oz. of Zima. 
You found the Travelocity gnome!
Just what is your class load?
The Lego will be gone FTFY My dad gave me all his old Lego FTFY
you shouldnt be disappointed  
WAIT, YOU LIKE ART BECAUSE OF WEED? SO BEFORE YOU SMOKED WEED YOU WERE ALL LIKE, FUCK ART, AND ARTISTS?
Don't hate on the "butter flavor" lovers. We're not all fat pigs. Popcorn is much better when it's covered in grease, imo. ....but for the record I get regular Coke because A. Diet Coke tastes like shit and B. I'm not retarded enough to think it'll even out the calories. Upvote because downvotes are dickmoves no matter how awful the comic ;) Also, it wasn't that bad.
Considering most services of this nature do tend to sweep the entire site, this is quite likely the reason for failure on their router and 'DDoS'  Dragoneer has been known to constantly lie and backpedal and avoid any issue that is pointed out.  Notice the thread closed, now, and he refused to address the full point of the federal law violations.  By the way, did you know FA moved to cloudflare? I wonder how many users know of this?
How do you know you just didn't tell that to  the dude taking the picture?
That's why you have a priest to move their fat asses off the feast. Either bear form druids or any soft of Tauren.... get of my food!
What the fuck?
Downvote for thinking abortion is taking a life.
I sometimes cuddle with my body pillow. :3
So Irene was a squirter.  Who knew?
what the christ
Hahah, word.  I've been sleeping on Kendrick Lamar... I heard a couple of tracks of his on youtube and just wasn't feeling him.  I dunno, maybe I'll give Section 80 a try.  Have you listened to Random Axe's self-titled?  Sean Price, Guilty Simpson, Black Milk.
In that case, I still think you should just prepare a picnic that will woo the fuck out of her. Killing and preparing your own food isn't everything it's cracked up to be, especially if you've never done it before.  As far as fishing goes, make sure to check your surroundings before you cast. Getting a hook in you isn't very pleasant. I also recommend a pair of gloves and some needle nose pliers. Fish can be really slippery and it might be hard for you to get the hook out without pliers if you've never done it before. When you are removing the hook, just don't rip it out. Remember, you just pierced a live animal! It's more of a guiding motion than anything. Try and find the hooks path of least resistance out.  There are usually kits you can buy that come with a fishing pole, bobbers, weights, and some lures. I wouldn't use the lures, just go pick up some worms. Don't put the whole worm on the hook, break it up into three segments or so and just use one segment at a time. If [this](http://www.fishsniffer.com/maps/lexington.html) is correct, then I expect you will be catching a lot of bluegill. Good luck with your fishing adventure!
INCE-     NO
Well sperm can live up to 48 hours post ejaculation but that is inside the a women's fallopian tubes. The mouth is full of enzymes that would kill the sperm pretty quickly. Overall, the mouth is not a good environment at all for sperm. 
They're just waiting to be imaged.
Although i live far away from the States, I'm a kind-of-constant WDW goer (at least 7 times) -- this will be my first Disneyland visit, ever.  Question: why do I need fastpasses for an open-air show? (WoC), are those for better seats? Any other tips will be much appreciated!
Do you have access to some spare cash? sounds to me like you need to get away &amp; go travelling. leave all that crap behind for a few weeks (or months, if possible), see some of the amazing stuff that the world has to offer, get some perspective. if you're stuck in a rut, break the cycle. I know where you're coming from, sometimes I feel like I'm just on a hamster wheel. but, as they say, life is beautiful, but living is hard. it can be a drudge, if you're in the same environment for ages, doing the same things, feeling the same things. but it's easier to break out than you might think. if you can't get overseas, get out into nature for a while, find someone with a log cabin, take a load of books &amp; some fishing gear &amp; refind yourself. when you get back you'll have a much better perspective on how you can change your life to introduce new experiences, make real progress, and be selective about the stuff you want to include and exclude in your life.
Typical UCF student
Fantastic ass!!!
Bread.
Context: http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/k067x/could_i_destroy_the_entire_roman_empire_during/
Envy does not fully define what I feel towards you right now.
Exactly; it starts with banning a few trolls, and then it slowly slides into the whole "safe space" bull. The only safe spaces we need are spaces to be safe from censorship.
You can't eat just one.
Clearly you are mistaken because women cast spells which make men make mistakes that they would NEVER MAKE if a woman wasn't around. 
no, only craft hats, metals or keys. Sry. 
I laughed so hard i fell over and dislocated my left shoulder. Thanks........
There is a difference between the **tidying** up you are made to do, and the **cleaning** they do. Unless your Mother makes you don gloves and hands you cleaning products.
I saw an article about an actress whose mother supposedly had her heart eaten out by an octopus. Turns out that whole account had been making crap edits to random articles so I got to fix them all. Mostly the misinformation seems to be on short/not very well known articles as the site tends to be pretty well moderated.
ooooh I'm jelly
Almost 36 minutes long. Wow.
RomeSweetRome subscriber 2,724 here.  *A community for four hours*
Depends.  If you have to selectively breed them, they become much more expensive.  I was a lab tech and part of the job was helping the PIs breed mice and rats for specific genotypes.  If we didn't have any, we had to order them.  It's a lot of work to maintain very specific genes.
Anyone notice the posters Dean Pelton had in his office?
I treated Darrow's as the neutral option, personally.  yeah, the speech didn't match it, but the action did.  I wanted to rat out the bastards that tried to subvert all augments to their will.  It makes sense that doing that would kind of freak people out about augments in general, so the "this may turn people off of technology and augmentation in general." note seemed valid.  I just wish Jensen's speech about it in the end wasn't so darn absolute :P.
oh my god, there is nothing more beautiful than standing deep in a quiet snowy swamp in december with a shotgun and hearing the first distant echoing yips as they pick up a scent, that grow gradually closer as they run it towards you.
Y u mad tho?
Oh, I forgot to add, it still doesn't run as a window with the registry hack, IT'S SIMPLY FULL-SCREEN, IF YOU ALT+TAB OUT AND SWITCH BACK IT NEGATES THE HACK AND FUCKS. YOUR. SHIT. UP.  Also, you have to hold down left+shift every time you load the game, after applying the registry hack, for it to work.
You're awesome.
But no GGG on Horde side... For the HORDE!  *Edit, You Horde haters. 
But...but...Mercedez said she really wanted to see me again:(
Gorgeous.  Would love to see more.  ;D
This is the equivalent of a woman, when asked about G-spot stimulation, saying "My clitoris works just fine, thanks."
A PM may have been more appropriate...
When he said it he was completely joking. He said it that way because he wanted to save face. He said "I'm almost as good as july. I just gonna put it just like that.How I'm gonna say it." He said that because that was a way of saying he wasn't as good as sen but not terrible either. In reality I guarantee he isn't near july's skill level.
Somebody please do the meme where you zoom in and replace the faces, with the girl on the far right's face.
It has been, but seriously who cares. It has been so long and it gives me such a laugh.
:)
The 300 is a flashy case with an outmoded design. I'd recommend [a HAF 912](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16811119233) instead.  In fact, you can shave costs in a few places for a better video card, too.  [Part list permalink](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/123i) / [Part price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/123i/by_merchant)  Type|Item|Price :----|:----|:---- **CPU** | [AMD Phenom II X4 955 Black 3.2GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/amd-cpu-hdz955fbgmbox) | $111.99 @ Amazon  **Motherboard** | [Asus M5A97 ATX  AM3+ Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asus-motherboard-m5a97) | $89.99 @ Newegg  **Memory** | [Patriot Signature 8GB (2 x 4GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/patriot-memory-psd38g1600kh) | $34.99 @ Newegg  **Hard Drive** | [Seagate Barracuda 1TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st31000524as) | $49.99 @ Amazon  **Video Card** | [XFX Radeon HD 6950 1GB Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/xfx-video-card-hd695xzdfc) | $209.99 @ Newegg  **Case** | [Cooler Master HAF 912 ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/cooler-master-case-rc912kkn1) | $44.99 @ Newegg  **Power Supply** | [Antec 620W ATX12V / EPS12V Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/antec-power-supply-neoeco620c) | $52.98 @ Newegg  || **Total** | (Prices include shipping and discounts when available.) | $594.92
That was definitely a "no fucking way!" moment! So awesome!
Gay?
Get back to the fields, Kunta.
SPRAYRACHA
downvoted until i saw username. Take my upvote..TAKE IT!
AB HC? Saweeeeeet
yeah because you know, having guns doesn't fit but having a firing projectile from your wrists like megaman  doesn't fit as well. 
Well, just off the top of my head, perhaps it could be as simple as:  mcom armed while area is smoked out?  +20 to the smoke thrower  'spotted teamate' enters smoke cloud... spot removed... +20 to smoke thrower  Think I've read something to the effect of smoke removing the spots, so maybe it already works something like this.... didn't get a shot at the alpha, guess we'll find out when the beta drops... hopefully SOON!!
On the day Steve Irwin died, I checked his wiki page and the photo was a giant picture of some guy's penis.
Weird. I pronounce it "pwn".
Seriously. She definitely lives the good life.
I've told people to sleep on there back here before.  Not for headache reasons though. 
Do you work in Portland, Oregon? Sounds like just the type of irony Portlanders love.
That's just awesome advertising if you ask me!
Your comment made my day. Kudos to you kind sir/lady/undecided.
“We have met repeatedly with the Department of Justice and there was no indication from the DOJ that this action was being contemplated,”   What they mean is that their lobbyists have been telling them for 3 months it's a done deal. That's the trouble these days, there's no honor amongst politicians anymore, they won't *stay* bought.
I'm aware of that. In this case I don't think so though. The switch was far too visible. She heard my birthday and you could see her struggling with herself. I told her my birthday and her smile faded away, she kept looking like she was about to talk and didn't for about two or three seconds, before she finally responded.
I decided to go with the 560 TI, should that be okay with the 430W PSU I picked?
I just wonder how Costco does that, with so generous policies geared towards the consumer? And not only that, you get a whole lot of accessories with the phone for free when you sign up with Costco. "Welcome to Costco, I love you." Wish there were sometimes a hot chick greeter saying that, I'd right then and there plant a kiss on her cheek.
Beat the hell out of em and become the MEAN uncle.
I went through a small phase, asking people if they would like 'oil' on their popcorn. 98% of the people asked me to repeat myself. Technically, what we put on our popcorn is called topping oil, and I like seeing the people's reactions when I have to refill the butter pan.
Is your lab a lean lab or departmental? How hard was the certification for you? was your institution a 2+2 or a 3+1? Do you plan on pursuing further or are you happy as a lab tech?
Its a laziness thing, at least as far as I can tell. I bought one for 25 dollars that came with a kief catcher. It produces a uniform grind faster than using scissors and a shotglass, but it by no means necessary.  Scissors and a shotglass works just as well. At the same time, if you are grinding to a powder for a vaporizer or cooking, then a common kitchen sieve will work better than both grinder or scissors. The grinder just happens to be a little more convenient.
that orgasm was the perfect combination of sex and violence
What scares most people about death when you don't believe in a God is that you wont experience anything basicly not be aware but when you think about it we you go throw that same thing every day when you go to sleep. Some might argue that you dream and so on but you dont remember most of what you dream and only remember it when you wake up anyway.  PS: I dont speak english as my native tongue but I hope I made some sense :)
To be perfectly honest, after being committed twice. I am more scared that I'm not crazy anymore but perfectly sane.
Repackaged shit?  You do realize those include the UNALTERED ORIGINAL TRILOGY as well as the new SEs?  And that is the only way, unless you steal it, that you can buy the UNALTERED ORIGINAL TRILOGY.  Have another downvote for acting like a jerk and not realizing that yes, the original UNALTERED trilogy is available for purchase.
cox internet service blows
I'm loving Santiago in there. 
Just posted a pic of yours in Tureaud...didn't see your post before.  Well done.
I used to bartend at Oggi's in Anaheim off of Chapman and Harbor. Food is okay, over 50 TV's, has a patio, decent beer...yada yada yada.   I think OC Sports Bar (is that the name?) near Angel stadium is better...but that could be because I worked at Oggi's.   Anyway, what team NFL team do you support?
That's more than a little worrying. What if, after writing a board-full of notes that everyone dutifully copied, he went into a "lock-up" just as the class ended. "Oh dear, I just gave the entire class a load of bullshit."
Also, Beyonce's video was clearly better than Taylor Swift's.  But of course MTV watchers went with Taylor Swift since they love and support white people no matter what.
it got old.
I had a conversation with my professor about 2 years ago, he's the kind of guy that's just always giddy, steers conversations, and pretty much lights up any room he walks in. He told me about his marriage and how he got divorced I forget how long after but not much, 12 weeks maybe.   I asked him why the hell he ever got married in the first place and he said "it's a wonderful experience, everyone should do it at least once in their lifetime." And I thought that made complete sense but I was confused why the hell he decided to get divorced and I asked so he says "because divorce is quite an experience, everyone should do it at least once in their lifetime."  But really it's more that I don't want to settle, ever. I'm on my first job out of school and I can't imagine working in the same place for more than 2 years, married for life is definetly not something I'm planning on doing. That, and I don't personally know anyone that's happily married after 15-20 years, it just feels like it's them settling.
lol?
HI AGORA!
I try to have sex with one of these womans. She ask lots of personal questions so she get to know me better. She say by, Screen go blank, PC get virus, bank account empty... Still no number for Jakucha.
&gt; i still have 15 more lbs til I am back to where I was when we first got together.   He's not having sex with you because you now weigh 15lbs more than when you first met?!   &gt;He says 190 would be a really good weight for me  He won't have sex with you until you are 190lbs? I want to throttle him. This idiot is toxic for your self esteem!  &gt;I don't get why my weight has so much to do with it  Because it's not only your weight. It's his psychological hang ups, possibly a loss of desire to be your boyfriend (even though he still loves you-- the passion is gone and he's too lazy and uninterested to get it back).  &gt;I am confident that if he would work with me, we could really regain this important aspect of our relationship back.   Exactly. That piece of crap is 100% responsible for letting your sex life die, keeping it dead, and torturing you by making you feel like you have to earn sex by losing weight.  &gt;It even annoys him when I bring it up.  He doesn't deserve to date you.  &gt;I just don't feel like I'm good enough for him so much of the time simply because of this attraction issue.  This is exactly why he's kept you for so long. You love him and see so much potential that has not and will not ever be realized in him, and your self esteem is in the toilet so you think a man who makes you lose a bunch of weight to have sex with him is too good for you.  You are SO MUCH BETTER than this. I can barely wrap my mind around what a bad relationship this will ultimately be for your self esteem. When you finally break up with him someday, you're going to be angry you wasted so many years on someone so undeserving of you.
gives it a bit of an rpg touch, it would certaintly change how pikmin were managed, as you couldn't easily recover a strong army after a failed attempt at killing a boss.
Here is a glacier east of where I live. [Worthington Glacier.](http://www.nebraskaweatherphotos.org/Worthington-glacier.html)  It looks similar and you can walk up to the base of it.
Here's to hoping!
Stop with the lies. If r/circlejerk  or r/circlejerkers reopens (which won't happen soon), there will be tough new rules. You will never again see posts like "Is [public person] a cunt" or "[Reddit affiliate did something bad]." That was the stated purpose of deleting all previous r/circlejerk posts, rather than just changing the css style like before. They are an embarrassment and a liability. This is a strategy to control the content.
Ditto.. Have a wired 360 controller; no regrets. =)
I grew up in Menomonie and then proceeded to move three hours away to go to college. I've heard plenty of bad things from friends of mine who chose to enroll at Stout, but then again, they might just have been bitter because they were stuck in Menomonie for another four years.
A friend used to brew with someone else and they brewed in huge 15 or 20 gallon wine fermenters. They took the lid off to check the batch and forgot to breath before doing so. Big burst of CO2 filled their lungs.
If this were posted on reddit there'd be 1000 unoriginal fucktards rushing to post unoriginal "derp if this happened in America" posts. Oh, wait.
Great pair owner, here.  Thanks for the compliment! I'm from Canada.
I keep ending up near the location of one of these like 20 minutes before or after it happened. Scary shit.
Exactly what i was thinking!
Yeah, my uncle has a 1885... I think he paid a grand for it. That's a pretty heavy investment for just target practice.
Why are there copy pasted ships scattered around?
&gt;(In Washington you can only have a temp for ayear before hiring them permanently).  I... don't think that's true.  Most of the temps/contractors at TMO would be here for 1-6 years before being hired... If it's true, I'd like to know though so I can bring it up and either get hired here or find something else.
I would also be interested in an answer to this question.
The Blueprint is my personal favorite.
yes, i copypasta'ed that *but took the time to edit out all the damned capital letters*. you fail extremely hard.
THIS IS NOT FACEBOOK.
Thanks. Yes that is correct. The sets went as follows:  * 100 * 20 * 20 * 40  Roughly 1:25 of total rest...
Leave the ginger vampire from True Blood and I'm content.
I think you should be thankful every day for not having gas nads.
TIL Mr. T is on Team CoCo!
i'll throw [my contents](http://i.imgur.com/NrFzX.jpg) into the ring-  iPhone, wallet, swiss card, keys, car keys and a spring assist knife.
I only played G3 but I couldn't play too much of it because the glitches were simply unbearable and made me lose my immersion. It just seemed unfinished, with glitches all around from the start of the game. A pity, it seemed to have much potential. How are G1 and G2 comparatively?
Nothing really "bothers" me. I'm just curious as to why people feel as though it didn't happen. 
 &gt;You said it, gojirra (your name is fun to say).  Because it sounds like 'Godzilla'? Gojira is the name of the original Japanese movie about a monster who comes out of the sea...
4291.40/35.23= 121.81  40,711.61/1800= 22.61  Getting paid less in gold than ever. 1962 currency was backed by gold (sort of). So in reality you are getting paid way less than you think you are. Bacon is still more expensive now.
That's really heartening.  Thanks for sharing!
At the least you can tell her how you feel, that she isn't allowing you to express yourself.  Probably not going to work though :/ she's probably a stick in the mud.  Maybe she thinks it's only something bad kids do, or that it will make you bad.  Some black hat options:  Attempt to wear something a metric shit ton worse than emo clothes.  Then the emo clothes might not seem so bad.  Or, pretend it's a school event.  The next day, after she's gotten a taste of it, ask if you could wear it normally.  edit: WAIT FOR AT LEAST A MONTH BEFORE ATTEMPTING THE SECOND OPTION.  It could easily cause a lot of suspicion.
Not really.  This really needs to go to trial and the judge ensured that that is what is going to happen (presuming that they don't settle out of court).  All the judge did was refuse to grant a summary judgment.
Hi Brad!
trannies you say?....mmmmmmh *strokes beard*
Thats not funny.
You know, there was a time when you're dad would tell you to stand up to the bullies and they would stop. Doing that now would probably get a kid expelled.
so here's something from personal experience on that situation.  years ago some friends were planning on doing the same for me (i'm however not fat and not bad looking but i don't think that will change the situation).  some friends of mine had actually gone through and hired a hooker they knew to do that exact thing for me.  Luckily I ended up having to work late that night and never showed up that night.  Had things of not worked out that way I would have been incredibly pissed about the whole thing (it's really wouldn't be that hard to tell, especially afterwards, unless your friend is just completely oblivious to everything).  Personally I would never want to be with a hooker and not really even with a slutty chick.  I don't really even like being set up with some chick.  I had said this to my friends in the past when they had tried talking me into getting hookers, so if your friend has expressed the same, don't do it.  The two best things that can be done for your friend is to get him to start going to the gym and have some girls with you that encourage him to go talk to a girl at the bar.  
Somebody please, PLEASE notify SNL and get that Black guy that impersonates all the other Black people to do a skit based on this. 
I stole r/circlejerk. AMA
100,000 AA batteries (not included).
Hilarious! I like how the "bully" pats the white cat when he walks out of the box, as if to say, "hey, no hard feelings, K?"
Great! So how soon can we weaponize it?
Google Geniuses  aren't worth arguing with. My thoughts on the entire thing are relativly simple.  Why do you believe that the Government would in no way shape or form be involved with the attacks on 9/11 or any other attack for that matter? What makes you believe that they didn't have anything to do with it? Or at the very least allowed it to occur?
&gt;http://i.imgur.com/5xQgZ.jpg  FTFY
How much for the texas 10 gallon
exactly.  thats just what the article said and it makes complete sense.  I know tons of super smart people that didn't apply themselves because they just thought they were too smart.   There is a reason that we have less "intelligent" people running the world...they just tried harder. 
Can we get a link to their armory?
Right, but if you opt out because you want to have a kid, (intentional pregnancy) shouldn't you get government support?
I certainly agree with the underlying message, but the delivery of that message just comes across sounding unnecessarily rude to me.  
I don't know if anyone's still paying attention to this post at all, but this is the answer.
Not a dress really, but you might find similar things by looking up "stripper gown." It's something exotic dancers use to cover up (so to speak) between performances. 
You and 7 other keffiyeh-wearing students can get your news from alternet and indymedia but the media that's being bitched about here - the media the vast majority of the population consumes, is owned by a tiny group of people. More so than just about any other industry.  Time Warner alone owns about 30% of anything current you'll watch or read.
#I try not to think about it anymore.  People do some of the most random stuff on this site.  If I got upset everytime someone downvoted a rational post of mine, I would have went back to lurking a long time ago.
I am also not a fan of this issue, it seems really short. Time compression in comics is always a strange thing, but it seems to me that the events in this book take place over a really short period of time.  Also why is Jim Lee still drawing like he only makes money off of big set piece originals?
I've tried it before. It's close but no cigar. He's themed a lot of bits. 
yeah, they all back up to Carbonite.  they only need one account since its unlimited.  
[It's a (kinda) funny story, but that's it. (Snopes article linked)](http://www.snopes.com/photos/animals/scubashark.asp)
Girls got to eat, meet for food at the common hall or someplace off campus. Then take her home, preferably her place, engage in naughtiness and then let her get back to work. Alternatively, give her a time frame to come over: "Hey babe, finishing this project up. Come over at/after x" This gives her time to finish what ever she needs to do.
No comparison to the Dark Knight.
Yeah, when you sell an item, you have the option to buy it back. But it's only the last 10 or 20 or something.
This five year old is my new hero. 
Bro, it really wasn't that great.  No internet, gaming was pretty much crap and sure there were some great bands and movies, but they were drastically dwarfed by the mainstream garbage just like today.  
I think everyone's already said this, replacing the buttons and stick will end up costing you almost the same as a TE stick. Little things like a soldering iron, circuit wire will add a little bit to the cost if you don't already have them.  I suggest saving up a little more for a TE. I've helped a friend find 2 great condition TE sticks selling for 75 &amp; 80 on craigslist.  Have you taken into consideration the weight of the fightsticks? I like them just heavy enough to rest on my lap...another reason the TE's are great. The hori ones, similar to the one you linked, seem a little light such that they move around. It really depends what you prefer and how  much strength you use.
hey, I'm just telling it like it is, downvote if that makes you feel bad. We're going to keep doing our thing, and India will keep trying to(and failing to) one-up us, and people will get a good laugh.   ie. LCA vs. J-20
Coding theory.
i want to try out this greggs place. is it only in the UK?
That's so adorable!! :3
HOW DARE YE UTTER THE BLASPHEMOUS WORDS MJ GREATER THAN KOBE IN R/NBA? OFF WITH HIS HEAD
I ripped two shirts and a belt loop on fucking door handles.
&gt;get more tattoos but that one is only slightly relevant.  Speaking of, I'm unemployed right now, but [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ama-gi) is my next one (forearm) once I have a few extra FRNs.
If this kind of shit gets to the front page I have lost all hope in reddit. This isn't Facebook 
I was about to ask the same exact question lol. I live in Los Angeles now, but I was raised mostly in Hyde Park/Logan/Cache County area.
I don't know why you would want to leave Sprint: They have the cheapest rates, best hardware, comparable service coverage in all *major* cities, and no data/bandwidth caps. 
The door is open.
"Long live the white girl" or this song by [Gym Class Heroes.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9mXuToX4SVk) Also I'm a white girl...
America the only place to live.
Says the putz.
Its the principle of it.  Somebody who is going to work for your company for free should not also have to give you money to do so and assist you.
This is pretty surprising, actually. Student:teacher ratio seems off too. [How exactly did UC Davis jump from #26](http://www.thedailybeast.com/articles/2010/04/11/the-100-happiest-colleges.html), to #10? What's changed? o.O
Wow.  At first I thought it was just a slow shutter but if you were on water everything would be really blurry.  Good job, I didn't know an iPhone could take such a cool looking picture.
this reminds me of good old times playing cs 1.6 :)
10 days  Under. 
What about the National Basketball Association?
It may be a generational thing...BB beyond was the cartoon I grew up watching saturday mornings with the old batman cartoon still in syndication but already finished.
Sorry, could you write that out in crayon, I still don't get it.
A better title would be here is another article that won't make you a good writer, but for those that are or will be it's a big help.   But, somehow I don't think that would make it to the Reddit homepage.  :P
I'm glad I'm not the only one who thinks that kid looks like oswald
I smoked waaaaay to much with a group of friends in a front yard of some random dudes house. Everything was going great until I hit a [10]... I laid in the grass and got massive spins... I ended up puking for the rest of the night... It was horrible... And to make matters worse, my friends all thought I had died and kept saying "were going to get in so much trouble! Where do we hide the body?!" didn't smoke for 3 years after that.. 
I use baby oil as a "shaving lotion" and make sure to exfoliate, especially if you sweat or it's humid out. Super clean shave and takes care of shaving rashes and bumps. Extra moisturizing too!
Suggestion: put his essay in a blockquote (using &gt; at the start of each paragraph) to make your post more readable.  That aside, you're exactly right.  **Edit:** Yup, the reformat really helps. Nice!
That kid is still soaked...
Fantastic ass!!!
They taste like Sour Almonds, I've never had a Sour Almond.
Roll back to your backup and continue.
In retrospect, this would have been a very boring image to look at.
Where are all these pushy religious folk that just start conversations about god(s) with strangers?
Learn the needed language and tools for iOS development and have at it! Anything is "possible", it just takes someone who's clever enough and has the patience to follow through.
Crisis averted.
UTG likely has a big flush draw here, ATdd+ and, as many of my home games have gone - once the game looks like it is breaking up and they get a good hand that flops decent (overs + FD) they will gamble it up where they are not getting great odds (unless he figures there is a great chance that people have worse draws/are folding).  I estimate that the BB shows up here with a 2 a decent amount of the time, and A8 a decent amount also (discounting a FD since I am assuming UTG has a FD).  In the best case scenario where you are up against A8 and JTdd you are only ~55% to win. (I realize that there are possible holdings that will increase your expectation, like no overs, no FD, against an 8 and TT for example... but given the action do we really expect such weak hands to show up?) If you were for sure 55% to win, ship it quick! But I feel like there are enough times that you are in bad shape against a random 2 that folding here is okay.  In retrospect, I like flatting in position on the flop. If there is then more action in front of you, you have very little in and get away cheap. If you are ahead you don't chase off worse hands, and can drop the hammer on the turn.
I enjoyed the punchline as well.
Sorry to hear that! A similar story happened to my 2 friends there, when they were walking to their hotel around 3 am after a clubbing night out.  They were attacked by 2 guys with knives, robbed, and had to go to a hospital. One of them had about 12 stitches on his head. The police was very effective, and actually somehow apprehended the assailants on the same night, when they were trying to rob somebody else. 
Well done, and go Sox!
made my day
and the not impressed by your performance is a ode to the GSP meme which was prevalent some 4 years or so ago.  Topical.
I looked for a Deckard Cain skin but nobody would have understood what it was. They all just looked like an old man.
I'd try and help double the population, but I'm two tired.
This is starting to make sense to me now. You verify uniqueness for the posters and give to charities from donations from people who purchase "nodes", or portions of the site liquidity?
MMMMMMAAAAAAAAAAGGGGGGGGGGGAAAAAAAAAAZZZZZZZZZZIIIIIIIIINNNNNNNNNEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
&gt; Adorable David Tenant in plush form!  FTFY
Hey, this is good too. Groovy!
Yep I'm jizzing all over that.
a driver decided to "teach me a lesson" yesterday and I went through his rear window. He was driving on a suspended license and didn't have insurance.
Holy shit! BRB, grabbing a pen to write this shit down.  She's gonna love this...I'm getting laid tonight!
**2011 sigh**
We're gonna need a bigger picture...
latin
Hollowpoint phone?
Maybe a 0 kill prestige instead? Dom/CTF would let you still get _some_ points. 
CLASSY as fuuuuuu
It'd make my day if someone could place the words "EVENTUALLY" on that image.
will do.
I'm going to do the same thing for /r/cyberpunk soon. I haven't looked into it very much yet, but I might use BigFriendlyRobot. You can check it out here:  http://www.reddit.com/r/BigFriendlyRobot/comments/j3vp0/bigfriendlyrobot_an_automated_flair_bot/  Hope this helps!
omg WANT ONE SOOO BAD NOW!!
Do well on your SAT or ACT. You usually take it junior year, and most colleges require a certain score on them in addition to your GPA for admission. 
Are you really 24?  Also, I love your tats and you're very sexy. Give your hair some time to heel! It looks frazzle-fried. :-(
What ever happened to that less expensive collector's edition that Australia is getting? The one with out the mountain and dragon
**AND WE CAN ACT LIKE WE'RE FROM OUT OF THIS WORLD**
http://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/k0qc7/til_that_eyebrows_play_a_key_role_your_perception/
Now the reason this is now my favorite meme is because it's funny and it's relatable. 
&gt;Flutter-plu-Shy  FTFY
Very True Blood I think...
just doing my job.
that usually doesn't end well. At least TOS era, anyways.
[Right back at you buddy!](http://imgur.com/2Db5J)
Did you train at all before setting out? And how good of shape were you in before the ride? I'm in only in highschool, and I've never really done much cycling, but I've always wanted to do something like a cross country ride, plus the idea of just going wherever I feel like and camping there sounds like something I'd really like :P
Understood.  In the case of the AR-15 though, it isn't short for "Assault Rifle", but "Armalite Rifle".  Just FYI.
So...what...he wrote a story, and there's a subreddit, and who cares? 
Nice nice.
To be honest I didn't pick up on it, I have never heard the word used in this way :)  Thanks for teaching me, reddit.
Well fuck.
if you are confronted with your mortality and you came out worse off then thats a pretty serious problem, not with you yourself like you are 'weak' or whatever but everybody needs to face the reality of their own death at some point the sooner someone can overcome this, the better off they and the rest of the world are a part of will be.  In that light heres [Flight from Death](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eMla61cOMtc)
If you're quick, you'll pretty much always beat a zoomed in sniper one on one like this.  Also, turn off auto re-zooming in. If you miss a shot, you're probably gonna want to move, and that extra second can make all the difference.
Welch did absolutely nothing wrong. Legally speaking, at least. There is no law against giving advice, nor should there be.
Nice. Thanks for sharing your experience. BC2 was difficult for me to get into, even as a level 5 veteran. I was a late adopter, and so people already had strong skills in the game and knew the maps. When I first started I was getting slaughtered, but it all builds with time.   I think the skills will be transferable to BF3 because of Frostbite, but there are so many improvements that everyone will be learning all over again.
great coverage thanks  : )
I'm still a fan of the hatch-covered glowstone lamp posts, but that design makes for a bad-ass altar.
&gt;Was interested in the words, not your life. I don't mean that in a mean way - I just don't know you, so I don't care enough about a single, anonymous internet posting to criticise the actual person.  Gotcha. So you cared enough to make a semantic dig but not enough to care about actual narrative/discussion you were inserting yourself into. 
Where would I start? How does one even freelance? Just doing what? Where?  Granted, most of my problems stem from acute fear, avoidance, and my own lack of self worth, but I also genuinely don't know what I should be doing to make an income. Where to look for jobs so I don't have to relocate. Where to look for work with startups. What I should be doing to improve my skillset. Things like that. Every time I make myself begin to look at job postings, I overwhelm myself with how much I don't know what I'm doing.  At this point I'm mostly ranting, but I appreciate your reply. :)
I had a friend whose goal of parties was to see how many people she could hook up with. I only saw two people with her, but I was one of them, so she got to three. I actually don't know. It's kinda fuzzy and there may have been more.   Depends what kind of "freak" this person was. The guy I'm dating used to be a God-complex fueled, stoner asshole. But he turned it around and now we're dating.   I'm a lot more hesitant to trust guys who have a gross sexual history or a reputation for cheating or other scum-bag things like that. There is a guy I know who I would fuck up, down, left, right, but I would never consider dating him.   Also, we unless you majorly fucked up, I care a lot more about gossiping about other girls than what a guy has done. You're probably not as weird as you think you are.
It's for if you want to be non-specific. I dunno. The term really annoys me. I mean how significant are they?
Then we make a cure for the virus, and volia! Cancer cured. But what if we need to cure the cure? Shall we send in snakes? And then the snakes, maybe Gorillas?
I just came all over my keyboard. Fuck you.
Yeah I never said ro2 will be a bad game, I said it most likely wouldn't be to my liking based on the gun mechanics and controls of the developers other games. I don't like the gun mechanics in cod games either, which is why I never play that series. 
Fine, but I really get irritated about this criticism of the McDonald's case, which I've seen many times before.  &gt;What most people don't know is how hot the coffee was   Yes, everyone who was around when the case happens knows how hot the coffee was because - news flash - McDonalds' coffee is fucking popular. Like the very next sentence says, McDonalds **had a policy** to serve the coffee at that ridiculous temperature, so everyone getting their coffee there would have experienced the same thing.  Ms. Liebeck should have been able to tell that the coffee was hot, too, based on the fact that she would have had to accept it with her hands. Those cups really don't provide that much insulation.  &gt;which they knew no one could drink and would cause 3rd degree burns within 3-7 seconds of contact.  [citation needed]  &gt;Despite the unanimous verdict for Mrs. Liebeck and even after the judge drastically reduced the amount awarded, McDonald's appealed and the parties settled out of court.  So? The outrage is and always was about the original verdict.  &gt;Most people believe she was driving the car  I have never heard anyone say, in a discussion of the case, that she was driving the car, and it wouldn't matter anyway. What does matter is that she held the cup between her legs, which explains the pattern of burns. This is a stupid thing to do with a cup of hot liquid. It's fantastically easy to accidentally squeeze your legs together a tiny extra bit and spill everything, or even crush the container outright.  &gt;was not seriously injured   Bullshit, this was well-understood.  &gt;and got millions.  Again, not relevant whether people were paying attention to the reduction of the settlement in the aftermath.
Gift card on the way to your email...it usually takes a few minutes to get there, let me know if there's a prob or doesn't show up.  Cheers, enjoy!
I'm only 15 minutes into this... but I just wanted to thank you for linking this. It is absolutely great so far.
Do you have *any* idea of what park rangers do with money left in the so-called "honor vaults?"  It's a race in the mornings to see which one can get to the honor vault and get some beer money...
http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/k0ptq/why_we_have_eyebrows/
Did you really ride the whole time with the pedals that were in the picture of your bike or did you swap them for clipless? 
I agree, it is most likely not getting enough power. Make sure the wire is plugged in. If it already is, unplug it and put it back in -- it might be loose. Also try a different wire from your power supply; that could also be bad (although less likely). What is the wattage rating on your power supply? It might not be enough.
&gt;The problem with AP is that his ratios aren't that great. .8 is good on his Q  Ratios are not the end-all and be-all of AP DPS, though. His Q has a .8 ratio on an 8 second cooldown. His E has a .14 ratio on hit, and a .14 ratio per second DoT. So, if he attacks once per second, in 8 seconds he will have done 8(.14+.14)=2.24 times his AP -- and Teemo's *base* attack speed at 18 is 1.3, not including his passive. If he attacks just twice, he does .28 from two on hit procs, plus at least 4 tics of poison, for  a total of .84 of his AP. Q resets the attack timer too, so he can easily get off 2 shots during harass.
there is such thing as a wrong subreddit
Cocoa Puffs, or more precisely, General Mills and/or other large corporations.
Good starter sewing projects, if you're into this sort of thing, are pipe bags. You can make them from t-shirts, scrap fabric, whatever. And you can give them away to friends who will be very thankful. :)
Correction, I've been here a month and it's just "Wow, these people really like ________ and cats"  The blank changes daily  The Cats Stay.
Ya that sounds about right.  But my problem is trying to study for finals and finish projects, when the my 2 month old niece (gf baby sits) is screaming the entire time... Forcing me to use multiple truck loads of trees on my back porch just to be able to drowned out the cries, or turn them into rock n roll songs.  The problem with the above is that by using excessive amounts of trees, my finals/studies are being put on the back burner once again.  fuck it
Programs don't have to be compiled to be called programs. Bash is turing complete, and thus can be called a proper programming language. A set of instructions capable of reliably performing a task is a program. An http server written in awk that uses inetd is a program. A three line python script that performs some menial  automation for convenience is a program. An entire cloud computing platform hacked together by calling virsh (libvirt) from a complex set of bash scripts is a program. There's nothing magical about compiling to the OS's accepted binary format that makes something become a program. Hell, some languages can be interpreted by multiple virtual machines, or be compiled to binary. Does running the same code in a different way suddeny demote it from "program" to "script"?
you aren't banned. 
that rage face has [already been created](http://i.imgur.com/51XgV.png)
I moved during the summer and it was tough making friends so I spent most of it inside. R/trees made it alot better surprisingly.
I can tell by the pixels.
I see what you did there :)
I painted my shoes.
Since you go to a CC, there probably is not a wide variety of bio classes available for you to take. That's ok. You can take a variety of upper division classes when you transfer your junior year and narrow down what fields in bio that you like. It's normal to not know your more precise direction until later. Don't sweat that right now. Focus on getting good grades, it will improve your transfer school options. Believe me, there's a good chance, you will change your mind a few times about what field you like most, after you take more classes. All totally normal stuff.  Definitely agreed with everyone about talking to professors. Ask them for the truth about their work, what they love/hate and why, etc.   When you transfer to a larger school for your BS, volunteer in different labs and see what you like. It's there that you will learn more technical stuff.
Wtf, no U St?
Did you have to remind us that the slitheen happened? D:
OMG!!1 Rage!
So what do you eat on a regular basis?
I would be Halo, because he kills aliens and doesn't afraid of anything
Most of the bad policy's Obama has are just carried over from bush. The only reason he. Enacts the policy's to appease republicans, who wouldn't vote for him if he personally saved each of them from drowning. (to semi-quote bill maher)
Lobster
Non-classical would be Pet Bottle Ningen at the Stone in NYC. Classical would be Petrouchka at the Toronto Symphony Orchestra. 
You mean, "Used-to-be-Japan"?
I figure it's one of those things I will have to address at the hospital.   Edit- me talk pretty
what i consider the "dream girlfriend" body. 
Ice?
I saw it when I was younger and I loved it then. I also loved the A-Team and Knight Rider and I watch them again and they're kinda crappy, so take my opinion with a grain of salt.
Bingo.
happy birthday!
apparently, according to all of the replies. I am from Venezuela, and never carried a "weapon" with me ever, for safety purposes. 
nope. it's 3 years
Thanks so much for the help. I already have some external speakers to hook up to it, I just didn't know if something inside the laptop itself would change the quality of the sound. I also read that the Lithium-Polymer battery is very good but is non-replaceable. Is this significant enough to warrant hesitation?
I don't really understand how Anvil falls under 'cool/ecclectic'. It's more trendy and popular, no?
That's a possibility. Here's to hoping that Guardiola decides not to renew his contract with Barcelona next summer because he gets bored of winning all the time and decides to come to North London! 
Redistributing the wealth
About 5 years ago, this happened to me.  What really pissed me off was that the damned car was unlocked, all they had to do was open the door, not bash the window in.
Narwhale
My apologies   http://i.imgur.com/lWUdT.jpg  bettr?
To answer your question, 6% of people are O-  * O+ | 37%  * O– | 6%  * A+ | 34%  * A– | 6%  * B+ | 10%  * B–  | 2%  * AB+|4%  * AB– |1%
For some reason I assumed the 111...1000...0 was binary. But of course that's almost the same problem, you just take a look at 2^x - 2^y (mod k).  Thanks for your answer, I don't think I'd have figured it out.
We have them in Aus. I've only ever heard them called Dagwood Dogs/Pluto Pups/Dippy Dogs, though.  Awwwyeeeeah.
I just.........came. In my car. Outside Pizza Hut. 
Hey everyone, don't worry! The rich folks have assured me all the money will trickle down to us soon!!  ಠ_ಠ
No, you THINK you know which car I'm referring to ;)
Good gawd, this is right up my alley. I sent them a few bucks. Thanks!
actually the FBI has their own terrorism task force, the JTTF with counter terrorism squads I-45 and I-49. originally, the FBI's role in terrorism was only when American lives were lost or in danger. for instance, when the US embassy in Kenya was bombed (KENBOMB) the FBI went out and investigate what happened and began searching for the suspects and brought them back to the states to be prosecuted on their crimes. 
Found it I believe.  http://www.dailymotion.com/video/x1uktl_9-11-by-the-naudet-brothers-1-of-6_news
Almost all PhD programs pay around $2000 a month. Masters programs are a little bit more tricky. In demand professions will give benefits similar to phd programs typically. I haven't looked in to masters of arts programs at all so I can't really comment on that.
As long as he uses "Prufrock451" as his pen name I'll be happy.
What build do you use? Any time I play teemo I can't do enough damage to be more than a mushroom ward king.
Try reading the FAQs here and at /r/loseit. Depending on your weight, your carb limit for the whole day should be &lt;50-100g.
I never got wang for algebra. Not really my thing.
Torrent 
Ow shot yourself in the foot sir. Yes you did.  Rule Number 1 on Reddit: Don't think you ARE reddit.
The Sims one hit too close to home.
Droid 3 is 4" at 960x540. I love mine. Of course, you need to also like a physical keyboard.
How much are we talking?  If you've got tons, you should find a car with the windows cracked.  Proceed to fill the car.
To where did you relocate?
I find that "Pardon?" works remarkably well. The term is so out of use that it gets people's attention (the desired effect).
You mean fine with Skyrim and those, too?  I don't get it for gaming, don't get me wrong, but I don't really want to give gaming completly up
I am simply saying that when you invoke statistics when discussing mentalities and use very unscientific explanations for something you are claiming is backed by science, that has nothing to do with ego.  You should take a research methods course, and then you will understand what I am saying.  You are trying to make this a personal thing, I am simply trying to explain to you why how you are reaching your conclusion is incredibly flawed.
I know... funny... but still illegal, no?
Aha! Found it. http://www.topdamas.com/ This is where I went. Easy, out of the way area, great girls, discrete location. Great memories there.
The shading under her eyes and around her forehead has changed as well, making her face seem flatter than it actually is. She wouldn't look like this at all with shaven eyebrows. [Here's my 2 minute attempt at doing a better job.](http://i.imgur.com/CuKgz.jpg)
It just came to an end before they could collect all of whatever they were collecting.  I was heart broken because I thought that it just moved time slots and I missed it. Nope...
Because it's still a projectile attack that takes the same amount of time to land. It's just an animation difference.
I would recommend starting with something like GameSalad or GameMaker. They'll let you focus on the game design part of it without worrying about the coding as much. Definitely don't stop there, but trying to teach yourself game design and coding at the same time is going to be a bit rough.
Download nad install XNA game studio and visual C# express, then download the [platformer starter kit](http://msdn.microsoft.com/en-us/library/dd254918%28v=xnagamestudio.31%29.aspx). Now go ahead and tinker to figure how it all works.  If you want tomake games you really can't go wrong with XNA.
Yes, my g/f wasn't sure what they were and took two too many of them. Here are two codes for Shazam, please respond if you claim one so people know they've been used.  PRKJRJLHJPHX  7E7WFN4RJWRT
Incredible. Nerd pride right there
back when internet came on CD-ROM for 1000 hours. I could not wait to install those CDs
So, like two ponies at most? 
Fantastic ass!!!
Yeah! Fit Jews!
&gt; Sharing my mirth via the tubes :]
I see what you did they're.
Falling in love, multiple times. Getting my heart stomped, set on fire and crushed, multiple times. Rinse and repeat, multiple times.
shitty post achieved
But a brightly-colored tassel might.
Too much work.
People that don't pay federal income tax don't have skin in the game.  That money funds the DoD, FDA, some of the DoT, the DoJ, and plenty of other government agencies that provide services to all Americans, not just the ones paying taxes.  Also, I believe the grandparent is complaining about the fact that the NYT is making the same pointless, unconvincing, and basically meaningless statements they make on a daily basis regarding topics like these.  They might as well be arguing with Bachmann about whether blue or green is a better color.
"Don't you climb trees?" "NO MOTHA FUCKA WE GOT BILLS AND SHIT" -[Katt Williams](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g87dWE6p0FA&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player)
"Most manufacturers suggest that the IS feature of a lens be turned off when the lens is mounted on a tripod as it can cause erratic results and is generally unnecessary. Many modern image stabilization lenses (notably Canon's more recent IS lenses) are able to auto-detect that they are tripod-mounted (as a result of extremely low vibration readings) and disable IS automatically to prevent this and any consequent image quality reduction.[9] The system also draws power from the battery, so de-activating it when it is not needed will extend the time before a recharge is required." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image_stabilization
Eh I really have loved all the BF series. I just think it does a better of Objectvie based fighting then any other game. I really can't think of a game that has a way of forcing you to team fight. 
The sound of the joke flying over gamelord12's head.
I'll take a Packers logo please.
the original makes more [sense](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jbuOwcZCWo0) 
Nope sorry, absolutely wrong.  The hunter will get far more benefit from the increased weapon damage than the agility loss.  Apparently you are the ignorant one that is unaware of the intricacies of the game.
What? Totally not legal in the US, at least not in my state. But I think I heard someone talking about a special license that allows that. I see no problem with it if the pharmacist knows what they're doing. At least with lower-level stuff, like allergy meds and whatnot.
Wait, I am now confused.  Is this a slingshot that fires *at* puppies, or a slingshot that *fires* puppies?
I would love to see those gorgeous breasts wiggling and bouncing ;)
&gt; He is Rowan Doyle, nearly eighteen, living in England (London) but from New Zealand originally.  I assume his accent is somewhat NZish
Hey I am new to the competitive scene of LoL and I play a lot of SC2. All the pros over there stream on justin.tv or twitch.tv or whatever they call themselves now a days and I was wondering what is the difference that makes all the LoL players stream on Own3d?  Not hating or anything I just don't get it.
That smell. You can't stop smelling it now.
If you cant find it get a friend to scan it into one for you for like 20 bucks lol
I'm sure this wasn't the case, but if she was fed to shit her CS would make little difference.
Yes there is skiing, only its 2.5 hours drive from the city. To be fair it's not anywhere as good as Canada, however that's why we have cheap flights to the South Island of New Zealand. Easily as good.
For those who haven't found out, I think I can shed some realization on this. From what I've read, I would guess that the son died at 10, from cancer. To waxiestapple, I am sorry for your loss.
Um, isn't Jump from Japan? As in, OCG?
Internship ended, which means she wasn't offered a job. Fucking loser.
My dad committed suicide 7 years ago, after a lifetime of depression and bipolar disease.  He was a victim of Lutheran brainwashing and guilt.  After he died, I knew there was no god, because no one should suffer like him when he asked for help. My sympathy and understanding to you.  We cannot brush suicide off and say, "They are in a better place" because they aren't anywhere.  But I think for some people, it's better to be dead than be mentally tortured.  I know for my dad it is. I cannot fathom the scum of a family your girlfriend had.  
Yes, anyone with a modicum of attention will notice it's instructions for the kids when the first enter the class. She wrote the list of things to do when you enter the class in the morning in the afternoon? That makes plenty of sense.  We know that the teacher doesn't know the difference between your, and you're. That's enough for me.  Also... Is handling little kids stressful? Yes. But if she has that much stress prior to the kids even getting there on the first day, she needs to find a new job.
How is it bad "journalism"? She did a piece on how people will hide key features of their personality and life in order to secure dates. Sure we already know that people in online dating sites do this, but it was an inside perspective.  To me its no different than any of those blind date tv shows where after the date is over they talk about how weird each other was.   He could have equally written an article about how she talked about her obsession with Jersey Shore and how she was annoying and that she should have included that on her profile if it was a huge part of who she was. The thing is, I really don't think him doing that would have been a big deal. I think half of the hype over it is BECAUSE he is a nerd and nerds are getting offensive over it because "normal" people don't like them because of their hobbies. The fact is, someone who isn't into Magic is not going to click with someone who is most of the time. If he really wanted to find a girl that would take him seriously, he should keep being him, advertise who he actually is online, and find someone who is into his interests. It would just be more beneficial to himself. 
and knives?
I wrote a paper about it once. Based on the UN laws of the sea it is clearly internal waterways. Interesting to see how this issue is resolved as the US has continually refused to acknowledge this.
The PHP and RoR hate is likely due to the same reason: they are so easy to use that there are a lot of bad, poorly coded projects out there written in both languages (yes, I know RoR is a framework and Ruby is the language, but for the sake of argument they are treated as the same in the public mindshare)  I can't speak much about Ruby or RoR, but I know the PHP language has some issues; however, you can still write decent apps in it and sidestep/workaround any issues.
and he sings while he does it...how???? the man is pure talent
&gt;And Antoine.  Sure, Antoine is a tool, but not nearly as powerful as religion. Nothing beats that "god says" routine for getting a good crowd reaction. You can tell people they have to do stuff because Antoine says so, but the response is going to be more unpredictable. 
Exactly.  I did this early and as a result have looked consistently younger than I would have otherwise.  Once I got over it I realized I actually looked way better this way.  
Um... no? Unless you're talking about a "wind" other than "wind" as in "the flow of gases" and "wind" as in "to wrap around something."
This is straight up the sickest one of these videos I've seen.
I know it has been a while, but I wish to respond to this point.   Granted I would have definitely phrased the title better were I the author of that blog.  I would have chosen a much more neutral headline, along the lines of. "Study shows large statistical surge among Catholic Priests involved with pedophilia when compared to the global average"   The more I think about it, the more I consider that the authors preferred tittle was quite sensationalist, however I also consider that this is just a sign of the times.  In our fast world of communication, titles are designed to draw attention, the exactness of his 100x is somewhat disputable, however it is well within the realm of error I consider to be sensationalist, but still accurate.  So I leave my comment as it is, noting, that there is obvious emotional inclination behind his sentiment, but still accurate to the figure in question.
I make up **long** stories in my head.
I don't really have any favorite movies.  I appreciate movies for what they are (especially groundbreaking ones I don't like like *The Godfather*), but I find too many faults or good-but-not-great elements in movies to have a favorite. Plus I actually don't like watching most movies over again. I presumed many INTJs were like that?  Ones that come close to favorites are:  * The Lion King * Judgment at Nuremberg * City Lights * Amélie
Falcon Punch?? Lol
I've always considered them to be a flashing red light they decided to pay for.
There's no reason for me to believe anything you're saying, as it's not only conjecture based on opinion, it's based on a myopic, misanthropic worldview.  The only thing that's certain is if there's a problem, it requires a solution.  In this case, your problem is twofold: 1) an individual person can have poor impulse control. 2) sexuality exists.  You're never going to solve those problems, and you're going to fuck society up trying to.  Hey! I heard another comedian said something insensitive about a minority group on stage! Why don't you go force a public apology?
WHAT ARE YOU? A DOCTOR OR SOMETHING?
i jump when i kill the manti by stepping on them in new vegas
I'm going to hunker down and see if I can build a rom. I'm getting more screws in my back Wednesday so I'll have plenty of time to mess around.
Sounds like you need to go to a better college; your classmates aren't very original:  http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/7j3y8/best_of_craigslist_cat_found/  http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/h6fvn/cat_found_near_commons/  http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/93ymw/cat_found_not_very_friendly/  http://www.reddit.com/r/australia/comments/9i1dp/lost_cat_found_posted_by_japanese_students/  http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/j09il/cat_found/  http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/5z4q4/cat_found/
Did she mention any specifics in terms of her hobbies or places she's been?  Those can be clues to at least a certain locale in Michigan.  For example, flannel could be for the upper peninsula (the U.P.) or for the northern part of the lower peninsula.  Or maybe she mentioned she went to some sort of sand dunes and mentioned how long of a drive it was.
Im pretty sure Bestial Holocaust has spanish lyrics. 
Come on now, even myth busters admitted there were 47 inner columns. You're better than that, I've seen your work.
How can I give this multiple upvotes? Amazing ass!
Perhaps, but that's a whole day that I can't Reddit. :(
you're absolutely right.  I completely forgot all that.
I'm the white one. 
Too bad fluttershy isn't really a flyer.
Let's talk about this.
Trust me after 20 or so you are drunk.
You should see the version without the wig.
I'm pretty sure Idra's "bad" attitude is an act. It does give him a lot of publicity after all.
This shit ain't on layaway! 
Or *Y: The Last Man* where they insinuate what killed off all the men was some sort of plague, but no one knows exactly what did it and it's never discovered during the series.  It's simply a device that starts the plot, to be accepted by the reader. Trying to explain it would cause it to be brought into question.
where do you go to college?
If anyone has some shrooms and wants to meet up here. let me know.
Holy crap!! I just wanna bend you over and grap those hip bones and fuck you HARD!! Sorry for the crudeness that was honestly my first thought!!
[Relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IRsPheErBj8)
I had a girlfriend who biked a lot and used square 5gal buckets and strapped them on as panniers. They were waterproof, easily replaceable, two seats (!), could be hung up at night for food storage, washing hair &amp; clothes, etc.   She had made simple hooks from some scrap metal strapping. Which she thru bolted thru the bucket. A bungie cord held it firmly in place. I miss her.
So many questions.  With that many people, why do you need to take a picture in the mirror?  Why is that keyboard so small and why is he so proud of it?  Was the keyboard super-expensive and that's why he can't afford a belt?
Hey here is a good idea. I'll thread jack this shit and talk about beer nonsense. Stick to the facts. Officers drinking on job, and using tax payer monies. I approve of this picture.
Actually, I said a billion and one and was outvoted.
Civilian just means "not military." As in, they are not in the Department of Defense.
very nice, I can imagine those piercings being rather entertaining 
Maybe you should play the game better, claiming that 2 storms kill everything and emp does nothing but remove shields from chargelots.
puh KAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHH
&lt;3
Tried to start a shirt company called Hypernatural, made one shirt then just kinda stopped doing it. I'll probably try to start it back up in the near future
Stupid iReddit. Said it failed to submit the first two.
Hmm, yeah that makes sense. Im a somewhat poor college kid, but since i wont be relying on it for transportation, it may be ok if i cant afford repairs for a bit. Anyone else have exp starting out/riding a monster?
How  many  Arabs  are  going  to  fly  to  Texas  to  celebrate  Thanksgiving ?  There  is  a  two  week  gap  between  Abu  Dahbi  and  Austin,  so  the  F1  teams  will  probably  return  to  Europe  anyway.  How  many  Brits,  are  going  to  fly  to  Texas  to  celebrate  Thanksgiving ?  The  only  other  country  that  even   has  that  holiday  is  Canada,  and  their  Thanksgiving  is  earlier  in  the  year  than  the  fourth  Thursday  of  November.  
Agreed. Cases are superior to tasks for group work, reporting and workflow.
* Multiple interfaces can be used on a single class, but you can only extend a class once * Abstract classes can be more than just function definitions - it's a regular class, you just can't use it without extending it.  Abstract classes are good when you have a base object that has children which will need to implement their own versions of some functions.  The parent (abstract) can define all of the shared functions, and the children inherit all of those automatically.  An interface requires you to code every one of those functions (or inherit them from another class).
The fuck, bro  That's all there is to say on the matter
This... now I just feel empty.
They need to just throw turn 8 onto the Austin track and everyone will be happy.
Not for humans.
WHAT? I can't hear you over Smurfs!
I was gonna rage at OP, but yeah, that's pretty god awful.
Not my own professor, but I had a close friend who had a professor die mid-semester. Not a very personal connection as it was an online course, but the professor did teach in the classroom too, and many of his students were saddened. Not sure what actually happened to the grades for the classes and the students though...
The software we use is mac-exclusive and for the price, they're pretty good for what they do.
You're all cunts.
&gt; Can people get tanks, military jets, missiles, miniguns?   Yes they can
Deleting 3,2,1
That is definitely part of the problem and something I keep trying to remind myself.   We've had her for about a month and a half. We got her during what seemed like a stable time in our lives and then the week after, a family friend died violently and unexpectedly and we had to have a friend stay with her for a few days. I'm sure that our emotions and sudden disappearance and reappearance did not help her transition.
Try sharpening your keys.
Oh, extremely helpful.  How about some sort of qualifier that says you're not full of shit?  
nah, it works just the same when you use it with windows or linux. no drivers required.
In the end, my point is simply this. You protect your own. Your family is the most important thing in the world, or at least should be (exceptions being obviously when a family treats someone horribly, but we're ignoring these factors right now because everyone can agree those people are terrible).   So, protecting your own means taking whatever measures it takes to improve their life, and increase their stock in the world.  Human life isn't more important, but to us it is. That is my point. 
Eastern is known for its volunteer work.  Get involved.  They do soo much community improvement that you can use to network, learn skills, and pad a resume or grad school application.
PARKOUR!
Preparing for downvotes: itshallnotbenamed are the binary usegroups, right? (also, what the hell, i'm guessing a _lot_ of people know about usenet and how fast a scene release hits the relevant groups.)
that's what I thought, but it doesn't.
peanut butter and nutella on toast
lachrymology. nuff said
no there is not
Was going to suggest that, he or she would know by the smell of it for sure though.
I did a 3300 mile trip along the west coast on a KLR. I posted a link in this thread somewhere to a writeup on ADVrider.com
Really? How would it cease to exist? Jeebus would descend from Heaven and bitch-smite us?
holy shit thats pretty cool indeed
Jitter-Bug!  No flashing lights, no cutesy symbols, just a great phone.
&gt;The way I see it is that conservatives are trying to prevent a portion of the population that will more likely vote Democratic than Republican from voting, but I'm sure that's a bit harsh.  I understand that poorer people may not be able to prove that they are citizens.  But what if poorer people voted Republican?   And if we don't verify citizenship before voting, you open the door for non-citizens to vote.  Like poorer people, non-citizens are also more likely to vote Democrat.  I'm far from paranoid this actually happens, but it is possible.  Your argument makes it seems like you are making sure your party gets more votes, regardless of where they come from.
Man, this is wrong.  I would not like my BF going on vacations with a female friend of him, since I would never do the same.  It's a matter of respect to the other and the one she should take to her parents home is you. 
I thought I was the only one who remembered THAT one episode in particular. 
I agree, it was intentional, and it was brutal, and that kind of shit really should be stamped out. I felt sick watching it knowing it was my beloved AB's that were doing that. But to request a life ban is a fair bit harsh I feel. I agree with you on all points except the never being allowed to play again part; dangerous tackles happen very often and if there was a life ban imposed on it then shit we'd see a decline in rugby players worldwide. 
Why's all that crap on your bike? EDIT: Is it rooted somewhere? It kind of looks like its been thrown on.
I suppose the truth is it's nice if it does grab your attention, but not essential.  The problem with not doing it is we live in a time where people will give up and move on. I hear books used to have like 10 page introductions and things like that 100-200 years ago, but because no one can be bothered reading them any more it's all been done away with.  I suppose the problem is the games industry is now filled with so many bad games that we need a fast way to decide if we should play one or not. And because they're all massively over-hyped and over-marketed to look great when they're not, the best we have to go by is "am I still interested after 10 minutes of playtime"?  With no demo's as well it's really hard to decide any other way.
High five! Unless you're a city fan.
&gt;Opportunity. A person in rage that carries might pull it out and shoot someone.   A person in rage might beat them with a stick. Bludgeon them with a wrench. Stab them with a knife. Pummel them with their fists.  Point is, if you wanted to hurt someone, you can very easily do so. If a pissed off psycho can hurt someone with a gun, they'll do it in a different way.  &gt;Police can't take weapons away from thugs before they commit a crime.  Do you honestly think that if guns banned, then *no* thugs are going to have them? If guns were banned, *only* criminals would have them by definition.  When has *banning anything* worked? Drugs are pretty much illegal everywhere in the world, has it stopped anything?
Ha, you can leave an 1.5 - 2hrs early and still be late in Seattle/Bellevue traffic.  /grumble.
Sure, the other guy would have had it all sorted out by now
I went through about four Saitek II keyboards, each with a broken space bar and multiple keys which wouldn't always work when pressed. I loved the keyboard, but each one would start to have problems with a few keys after about 6 months, and once the space bar went out it was done for. That's actually the specific keyboard which I was talking about in my other post.
That\* shit into\* your  You were correct. 
Crazy life you live bro. 
looks like you accidently an acquittal for xenophobic comment
I celebrated with some frozen yogurt! :)
 #fuckslasher  Wait no, don't fuck slasher...shit.
BRB, going to make several of these with jack-o-lanterns.
I don't know. He was never a preferred option for Mourinho. I like Pedro, but if Mourinho doesn't, then there is no place for him in the squad.
There was a Facebook group about how people hated *that guy* riding around campus at our University. My advice is, don't do it...please.
That only Tyler Perry gets.
Shirt woot dood. I own a bunch of there shirts. My favorite is "the binge"
Just 3-P0, actually
It's kind of subtle. What I saw is that people just tend to tense up all of a sudden when they overhear that you're an American. 
I'm sorry you feel that way.  I hope you have a nice day.
I almost forgot: pictures of people will usually require a model release to be signed. Getty provides the form. So it's best to just submit shots of people you know, unless it's a big crowd. You won't need the release until the image is accepted. Then you just download a pdf.  Same with property. You'll need to get the owner to sign a form if you want to use his or her property in advertising.  Edit: cut the number of typos by almost half.
If it's not already apparent to you all, we live in a POLICE STATE. 
I think it's the words "meat" and "girth" used in the same sentence that causes the mind to think *dick*.
Thank you. For me it was never an option to quit so I kept at it. The girls are doing great now but they'll probably always be small ( at 2.5 my little one is 19 lbs).  I appreciate what you do!
So you mean newer games won't run? I saw videos running Crysis 2 on that Macbook Pro
You're not dying, don't be melodramatic. It sounds like a pretty standard bout of sickness exacerbated by hypochondria and panic attacks. You might have a terminal disease (any of us might) but it has nothing to do with the symptoms you described. Don't even ask, "But what if?" Just rule it out.
&gt; ...and I'm paranoid.  You can tell us about a collection you *used to have*... before that tragic, tragic boating accident.  I hate those boating accidents.
Jay-Z, I love you even more now. That said, I don't want to be getting in your way and all that...
I hear if you drink fap water it makes your own taste way better.
Entourage 
Are those Runes?
No worries! I just wanted to clarify for my own sake.   You know, it may have less to do with the actual writing and more to do with Dany being a 13 year old girl and me soon-to-be a father of a girl. Maybe in a different context, it wouldn't bother me at all, you know?  *Oryx and Crake* is a good read definitely worth your time, regardless of the discussion!
try a crop where you only keep a 4x6 frame to the right around the family. i think it will work better. just a suggestion tho, still love the naturalness of the characters :)
How did you quit? Are you in any NA programs?
Thanks for your reply, have an upvote! All fixed now!
I believe that's a rockchuck. Officially called a "[Yellow Bellied Marmot](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rockchuck)"  I see them pretty often at higher elevations. They seem pretty stupid, but they have some massive claws.
I would have reconsidered until I read his reply to me and the other person who responded to him.  Nope, he's just *oozing* smug self-satisfaction about his sexual adventurousness.  Seriously, no one over 25 feels the need to brag about salad tossing on the first date.  If you're into that sort of thing, you don't care, and if you're not, it's gross.  I wasn't the only one who thought he was smug, and he's told the other person that we just need to "get laid."  I can tell I'm getting old when this attitude annoys me so much.
Why is it "wifey"?
This is a great idea and I'd love to participate. However, I'm a doofus with these things. Wil it be possible in future to buy a node without AdSense?
There's also "Henweigh."
"Alright sure, lets change the release date to damn near 50 years ago."
Third layer of meta fails in this case :P
The movie as a whole had a strong beginning but fell apart.
Best [holster](http://i.imgur.com/EjpiI.jpg) ever.  (Not pictured: Ti wedding band.)
Couldn't agree more, this is driving me nuts too.  A B worked on the NES because they were lined up horizontally, the diamond shape of the buttons on the 3DS does not allow me to use those buttons nearly as comfortably.
TIL
How the hell did you get on the internet, Toby?
And if you're *still* concerned, you can hold the first round games on the home fields of the higher seeds. 
Awesome list OP!   You're *Missing Godspeed Hellbound by Black Label Society* tho :o such a good song :)
it's a carb
I've heard of this type of thing happening before
I detect sarcasm!
Um, the devil?
Jesus Christ you are all cheeky funny bastards! Fucking brilliant!
As an aside, if anyone wants a lesson on what the Liverpool way is, simply see any Chelsea fan now and do the total opposite.
Fair enough, good luck selling stuff! :D
Given his goalscoring record... Lets just say, I would love to be surprised.
I know I've scrolled down the front page too far when I get to something like this.
I'm not a scientist, but it makes sense to me that creatures with shorter lifespans, large amounts of offspring, and simpler biological systems (fruit flies and mice) make better test subjects. 
don't cry kurosaki-kun :'(   haha i got my wish :D
Poojar.
You could always just like the [Karmin](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=khCokQt--l4]) version; it doesn't have Busta but it has a pretty good version of his rap, and as an added bonus, it doesn't have Lil' Wayne!
That was so incredibly poorly written that I completely lost track of it by the end.  Too bad, because the story sounds very interesting.  Somebody who knows how to write needs to re-do that.
I didn't really care for Rose until Martha came along.  Then I instantly missed her. Martha's whole "lovey dovey" story arc bothers me to no end.  So for that reason, I ended up like Rose. Great point, though!
Oh wow you really do, love the Country [F]un one. You're awesome c:
For some who still know it by another name: this is Hudson, renamed.
Heres a tip stop playing fantasy football and follow a team.PUSSY!
I thought I disliked her, then I met Amy. At least Rose grew, adapted. Amy still hasn't hanged much.
Very interesting. Yeah, I don't like trying to change anyone's mind on topics like this or religion. It is nice to learn from others and see how their thought processes are. I usually don't even comment on 9/11 but I thought it would be nice since people just like to downvote. 
My first attempt at a political cartoon.
[Here's a link](http://canvas.landsend.com/pp/Blazer~206428_-1.html). I own it too, it's a great value for the money.
If the room has a A/C make sure to turn it on.  I walked into a room in Kieley yesterday and the a/c was off, Nobody went to turn it on before the professor walked in.  People are sheep, Turn the a/c on and revel in its coolness, they are pretty powerful.
Please refer to my dozen or so comments as to why I dont like trolls, it is answered there are I would rather not have to post my reply again.  "This simply isn't true."  The comment replies tend to disagree with you there, maybe you dont mind trolls but most people replying seem to.
Well once I was researching Jehovah's Witnesses. The Wikipedia article said that "ALL JOHOVAS WITNESSES ARE FAGS!!!!". Pretty sure that's false. While I'm sure some people practicing that religion are homosexuals, I doubt all of them are gay. Then again, its always 2 guys or girls coming to your door, so, maybe...
I tell myself I'm replying simply to praise you for your sleuthing skills.   But deep inside, I know better.
I'm sorry to say I've never in Australia seen an up speed above 1mb, but this is definitely worthwhile software, good work.
I sometimes forget all the amazing movies Robert Zemeckis has made. [Back to the Future, Who Framed Roger Rabbit, **Contact**, What Lies Beneath, Cast Away... Damn!]
Ohhh fetlife how awesome you are...
RO2HOS, maybe.
Fox *employed* most of the visible Republican office candidates. It's not a conspiracy, agitprop is an old and well used concept.
But they no pick up.  No dim sum for Jakucha.
Nah, I ate something similar when I lived in Japan. It's called [eho-maki](http://www.google.com/search?q=Eho-Maki&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:unofficial&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;tbm=isch&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;hl=en&amp;tab=wi&amp;biw=1163&amp;bih=615#um=1&amp;hl=en&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US%3Aunofficial&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=1&amp;q=%E6%81%B5%E6%96%B9%E5%B7%BB&amp;oq=%E6%81%B5%E6%96%B9%E5%B7%BB&amp;aq=f&amp;aqi=&amp;aql=&amp;gs_sm=s&amp;gs_upl=14780l14780l1l15712l1l1l0l0l0l0l266l266l2-1l1l0&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.&amp;fp=282402044c1e7150&amp;biw=1163&amp;bih=615).
If you actually examine the record of the evrironmental or "green" movement, it is abysmal. Countless millions of dollars just wasted and stolen, with nothing useful to show for it. Oftentimes, more harm is done that good. It's a scam that depends on greed and fear and hysteria to keep it going.
Hey did you guys hear about the **I N S U R R E C T I O N** in Libya?
[Here's the comments. Screencapped it in case of deletion.](http://www.reddit.com/r/runescape/comments/jyzgb/hit_2k_total/c2g9tn0)
Sriracha spray bottle, SMART
I'm just waiting for r/beerporngonewild...
You haven't tried Nutella yet?? It's like spread from the gods. I eat it straight out of the jar
Wut?
Thank you for introducing me to that magnificent twitter account.
when you say camping do you mean with tents? what's the story? :)
&gt;The true mark of your character is what you do when you aren't thinking about consequences, not what you do once you're facing them.  That's beautiful. I kind of wish you were some famous dude, so I could put that on my list of inspirational quotes. As it is, you may have to settle for an upvote and a FB/G+ status 
Especially our "public relations" (propaganda) tactics.
dude, that's so many! UPBOAT!
+1 for batteries.  I ordered so many of those damn things as the supply guy for a 15 person division on a submarine (no night vision, plenty of outlets).  Can't imagine how many the 35th MEU would run through even with just daylight ops. You can rig AC adapters for CD/DVD players as chargers if you have rechargeable batteries but if you do it wrong the batteries won't charge or you can damage them.  And of course you need to run a genny for AC power.  :)
Chris Brown is a bitch, and Jay-Z is showing him he is a problem.
indeed
Well it also depends on how it is given.  I've been tanking lately on an alt for the first time in years, and some people are more polite than others.  I had one guy call me a dumbass because I didnt' realize that one boss's adds needed to be tanked, whereas I would have appreciated him simply stating "please tank adds" or something similar.  I'm not a dumbass, I'm just used to healing c:
Looks like a grass spider  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Grass_spider
Btw, it's a cat.
We don't have ONE multi-billionaire who is an enormous space buff? 
&gt; But since it's legal in MD and VA, the criminals just walk across the border, leaving the rest of us to hope there's a cop nearby.   Uhhh.. really? Are you sure you didn't just tell yourself this happens? Maybe I could accept a set of data with slightly higher crime rates but what you just said is ridiculous. (Edit: the notion of higher crime in DC isn't ridiculous, it's the notion of that incredibly simple explanation being anything other than internet argument fodder)  Also, I was referring to every forum thread on the entire internet that contains a post of someone's personal firearm, up to and including this one.  It's just a natural phenomenon as far as I'm concerned.
TIL there's more perverted animals
The local gas station has been selling 24 ounce cans of rolling rock for 99 cents.... i love it, im essentially buying an 18 rack for under ten dollars.  
The shading under her eyes and around her forehead has changed as well, making her face seem flatter than it actually is. She wouldn't look like this at all with shaven eyebrows. [Here's my 2 minute attempt at doing a better job.](http://i.imgur.com/CuKgz.jpg)
There's lots of inbetween on that story. I have a somewhat adventurous life, thus my name.  Only one time in Arabia did I experience something weird. Two friends and I managed to find some bedouins who let us sleep at their camp and eat with them for free so long as we cleaned their horrifically disgusting kitchen. We did. The bedouins left in the middle of the night to go over the border to Saudi Arabia to chase a young camel that had escaped, so we were left all alone in the camp, sleeping outside. We woke up to pitch-blackness at around 3am, hearing faint footfalls in the sand about 50 feet away. I quietly grabbed the bedouin's shotgun that they left behind, it wasn't loaded, but I figured it would be a good enough deterrent. After my friends and I standing still for about 5 minutes, wide-eyed and listening into the dark, we realized that the foot-falls were just the sounds of the bedouin's tent flaps lazily folding against the light breeze. They happened to sound just like someone walking in the sand.  So that was the only other time I've experienced something weird, outside of Shikoku, that is.
Bass aren't line shy. Use what you feel comfortable with.
A "new" video showing something that DIDN'T happen at all?  Oooookay....  [This](http://www.citizeninvestigationteam.com/nsa.html) all kinda destroys anything missile related.  If it is the same video as we've already seen, the same questions apply.  Who is in the air?  How did they get the footage if all air traffic was grounded?  What persons exactly saw it and what are their stories?  Can it be backed up?  Instead, like the one before a few second clip makes people jump up and down barking that this would be the REAL evidence yet don't ask the critical questions.
Did you watch all of TB's SCI games? and what do you think about the way he is funding the tornaments?
You guys wanna play gamecube? 
I suppose that is correct...in a manner of speaking.
&gt;'merica.
10am and still nothing.  Well, I guess we did get Xenoblade Chronicles...
&gt; I admire your honesty.  Hell, I like you.  You can come over to my house and fuck my sister!   FTFY
now that I think about it, it might have been a different issue with my network
After seeing the enormous glass dome in the ground housing the city, I've realized I need to be a part of this! But yeah, I.P. please!
Where I am located, the only clinics available to me are hardly free.  Getting tonsillitis cost me well over $300 thanks to the costs of the visits and the antibiotic shots and various antibiotic pills they tried.  Actually, I lucked out when it came to oral antibiotics because the local grocery store provides most generic ones for free.  The only time I had to pay was when they had to prescribe some really strong and expensive one because the others weren't working.  And that was $60 but it was supposed to be $90ish.  At least that one finally worked.  The worst part is that I am insured.  I just have a super high deductible (can't afford any other plan offered to me) so everything is out of pocket unless I end up in catastrophic circumstances.  So yeah, cheap access to antibiotics would be something I am interested in.  I can get antibiotics for "free" but that is with a doctors prescription for them.  The cost of getting that prescription can be massive.
Yes. At the time I thought it was insane.
WHO ARE YOU! I GO TO ELITE!
Hipsterrrrrrrrrr!  /syndrome
It worked! Thanks so much!
Zinnia Jones is awesome.
J4, Garen, Xin, Galio, Poppy, Lux, Sona, maybe Vayne too... Poppy alone probably eats more than everyone else. 
One word of advice, actually smile, ESPECIALLY if you're wearing red lipstick. Other than that, I think you're sexy, I personally like the blonde better on you though!
HMMMM, LATENT HOMOSEXUALITY MAYBE...
I love drawing brackets more than seems necessary.
:D THANK YOU!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Yeah. I should have noted a few more things too. Improved morale = more work. More employee approval = more work and higher productivity and fewer issues. Employees police themselves and point to cheap gaming system as example of why you shouldn't be mean, steal, etc.
What you are describing is empathy, the ability for humans to put ourselves in other peoples situation and understand what they are going through. So when something bad is happening to someone, our empathy kicks in and we feel compassion for them.
[](/b11 "Don't start with your fancy mathematics")
Where can you try out mechanical keyboards? I'd love to look into one, but I'm too scared to buy before trying.
i freaked some balls the first time i got high. we took sum bowl rips at a middle school down the street (not high) went to this kids house and rolled a dewbie at like 12 and smoked (still not high) and then we went to meet up with these girls to skinny dip (me and a friend and 2 girls) after just starin at boobs for 10-15 minutes we meet up with our other 2 friends and finished off our bud with bowl rips and a blunt. we were walking back to this kids house through our golf course. about 200 meters down this hill from where we smoked on the golf course. as we were walkin, i kept askin "how would i know, do i look like it, etc...." as soon as i crossed the bridge i looked at the moon and just freaked the fuck out. i was trippin hard, like my soul was connected with the moon that night. i'm pretty sure i started chasin my friends and we were all geekin out. it was a good night
I am the Danger!
Because fiance sounds fucking stupid.
*LeSean
"HANDSOME"
this may have been mine as well. I loved ATB even back then.
Who the fuck even thought of that part anyway?  "What's the first thing you think of when you think Nirvana?"  "How about some douche sitting on stage on his knees headbanging and random people jumping on trampolines?"  "Ya perfect let's do it!"   I hate this world so much sometimes
Yeah i'm pretty keen on making lemon, ginger and honey "tea" when I have a sore throat, and really feels it helps.
That bat seems pretty tame... 
The greatest troll
It'll give your colon a streak-free shine
I want my self post advertising the TU Outdoor Club to show up in r/Temple... tried twice now.
is this for real?
&gt;i hate religion as much as the next guy, but religion isn't the problem. it's a symptom or maybe more accurately a huge contributing factor. still, PEOPLE are the problem.   We have a disagreement then. I think that people take action based upon ideas. Religion is a body of ideas which are formalized and consecrated. Many of those ideas are evil, but are presented as good.   I think that from the stories on here, the *ideas* that holy roller parents pass on to kids, cause the kids to take fucked up actions, or be fucked up. It is the fault of the bible.  It is like this. If I use a car repair manual to fix a car, and the manual is wrong, it is not my fault. I took action because I was following the directions of the book, and why wouldn't I, right? Except that a car repair manual is infinitely easier to figure out than a religion. Sometimes I think religions are purposely designed to be contradictory, to fuck up it's readers and not allow them to understand, so they can't make a decision.
&gt;Space racist  Not by the end of ME1.
Did he really not clap because of the Rihanna beating incident? Just seems like they took a photo when he was in a different state of mind, maybe he cheered after the photo was taken.
You beat me to it - most Lobsters at the place I work at are killed with a knife as fast as possible (as well as safely). They're dead long before they hit a steamer.
###You ask too many questions!
Yes, every time she does this. Who could say no to that.
I love your mantra! Stealing it.
I agree, but at the same time, imagine if you sincerely believed in something, and someone told you flat out, "You are wrong, you sure you aren't confusing gulls for the divine?" That is an asshole move, and that is how you would tell the story to your friends.
who is this guy with my Kelly? That slut.
kill your roommates, use their intestines to insulate the doors and windows for quietness - there's plenty. Will provide enough food for a few days too from the muscles, you sick fuck.
Isn't Link a little young for that transvestite to be propositioning?
Hmmm. You can def get 12V out of a standard PSU, but I'm not entirely sure you are going to find the amperage you are looking for. That amp lists that it uses 2 x 30 amp fuses, which is quite a big of juice &lt;g&gt;. IIRC most 12V rails from modern PSU's only put out about 15A per rail, but I'm not entirely sure how you would go about combining the different rails.  Maybe someone else can chime in and fill us both in on the details.
Even better when you do this when there's an uber up. Get the heavy killed and the uber wasted. Jackpot.
Wouldn't kids get credit for describing how to make a bed either way so long as their answers were clear and described the process well?
15 yards, automatic first down
Take it take it!
I assume you would rather replace it with tech? **JUST LIKE HER SOUL!?**
On the first day of school it's probably a good idea to make kids feel comfortable and confident. Making them dislike school at the first opportunity is probably not an effective educational strategy.
As much as everyone is going to hate this idea, I honestly think it's going to be cell phones. I mean, it already is in a way but what I'm talking about is much more broad.   The rise of smart phone cameras is well documented but what most people don't realize is that there is a growing number of people who take these things seriously. Eventually if you have a sensor in your pocket at all times that is more than sufficient and has a computer attached to it, who's to say that you don't download the Canon or Nikon app?  Then if you want to get crazy you can slap that "sensor" into some sort of open sourced body that allows for any number of sensor(phone)/lens combinations?  This is what I'd like to see happen.
That's not what mainsoda stated though.  What's stated is that only Libertarians even understand the problem in the first place -- that "science and the scientific method are shamelessly manipulated by politicians".  The claim made is that this is objective fact, and that nobody except Libertarians know that it's true.  What you're saying is that libertarians or any other group each believe they have the best solution to this particular (or any) problem.  I agree that generally this is the case, but that's not the issue; mainsoda reckons that non-libertarians don't even know "this particular problem" exists.  In the case of this particular problem, it's because it doesn't really exist -- we have a disagreement about the nature of reality.  If climate scientists say that they aren't being manipulated and that they are doing good science, and here is the data, then how is it that a Libertarian internet blog surfer suddenly understands their situation better than they themselves do?  The solution to the disagreement is to investigate the problem by interviewing hundreds or thousands of climate scientists, and review the data -- and to see if you can reproduce experimental results, for example.  Use the scientific method to determine the nature of reality.  Posting instead that only Libertarians can see the truth is childish and insulting to all concerned.
Midway Island perhaps?
I did this, it takes a little time, and awkwardly approaching random longboarders, getting friends to do the same, but its so worth it to see cruises getting organized due to your effort.  Now its at the point where group members get discounts at the local shop, and they'll toss in prizes for events too : D  so just keep on truckin
it's illegal to throw paint away
&gt;I mean, there is more than enough evidence to support that there was in fact a controlled demolition.  Maybe in your world, in this one a bunch of researchers, investigators, countless university departments and professionals released their best guess.  http://www.nist.gov/el/disasterstudies/wtc/  So far nothing has been published that would discredit this report much less suggest some sort of controlled demolition.
no.
You have a funny name for being in a religious subreddit LOL :)
I can see the difference. AMA.
Then say mine. 
I believe it's an FP-PLNK cartridge; these units had all the amplification built in like many other portable units, but had the interesting advantage of being crank-driven, a surprisingly sustainable product for its era.
It's creepy regardless. inb4 HERP DERP YOU'RE SO PC 
http://www.ragemaker.net/  Otherwise Adobe Fireworks is my personal preference for making them from scratch. 
I live in the bay and I will call it Cannery Row thank you very much.
